Where their priceless blood reddens the grass the ground,
I have received emails from parents asking if I do any writing workshops during the school year. Thanks to the Internet, I am now offering "Guided Mentorships" for young writers across the country!
soft noise of rollin tires
Your credit union has not updated its strategic plan in a while. A plan is a necessary component of any credit union’s short and long-term growth strategies. But these plans need to be examined and reviewed often. Metrics must be put in place to measure and gauge the progress being made. And credit unions must be flexible and realize that plans are meant to be altered from time to time to adapt to the ever-changing marketplace.
But without tension, life get's a little dull, too.
Here are this year's contenders:
It was a sight to behold.
Glad im not povi anymore!
Back in Sept. 2010 Karoline (From Karoline's Corner) held a giveaway to celebrate her 500th post. I was the lucky winner of that giveaway! I was floored when it arrived and I opened it to find a gorgeous stitcher's pocket, package of needles, and stork embroidery scissors! Thank you so much Karoline, it is all wonderful! I will treasure the stitcher's pocket always, you did a fantastic job on it!
Former Worcestershire County Council leader George Lord has been jailed for four years for a series of sexual assaults.
Every class we taught was “graded” by the students, who submitted a feedback form, rating the class on a scale from 1-5, on about half a dozen points having to do with the quality of the class. Although I was and am fairly conceited about my teaching ability and about my ability to recognize and improve my teaching flaws and correct my failures, like all the other instructors I read the student feedback carefully. As far as I could tell, Kathy and I were the two highest rated instructors in the program.
I also learned that if you loan your neighbor one of your generators, you don’t give them the only one that will power your well, refrigerator, and freezer. Duh! Our neighbor’s have an infant and a toddler. They learned that their generator was too small to run their pellet stove, so we loaned them our big one. One of our small ones would have worked perfectly fine for their stove. Duh, again!
Note: For the past 7 1/2 years I have been training and growing as a martial artist under a Sensei — instructor — in mixed martial arts. My Sensei’s instructor — Sifu — original instructor was Bruce Lee. I have been a brown belt for over 2 years.
In other news, I’ve been surfing the blog world, and I found a few things in the waves of information I thought were interesting…for example: garden markers. I really like the idea of transforming something you already have into something you need and/or want. I love seeing how people can be so creative, and I like trying to think of things on my own, too, though right now, I’m sticking to a lot of tried and true with the garden experiment, i.e. read/listen to an expert on how to plant, nurture, cultivate, etc. and mimic. For my own markers, I might mimic the example from thesteelfork.com that uses cork on a stick. I love wine…I have corks.
I am unsure if the market could bear me doing both under the same name….
How much is the request to the ASA?
and all of their great tips and designs. The "how-to"
PS - i got my 'tree' up - well it's not a tree per say - it's a dress form - but i wrapped garland all around it - strung lights around - hung balls as a belt and trim for the skirt - has a star atop - it just screams 'it's going to be a fashionable merry Christmas at this home' .. i couldn't be more pleased with myself!
Noah… Genesis 6:5-13… “And God saw that the wickedness of man was great in the earth, and that every imagination of the thoughts of his heart was only evil continually. And it repented the LORD that he had made man on the earth, and it grieved him at his heart. And the LORD said, I will destroy man whom I have created from the face of the earth; both man, and beast, and the creeping thing, and the fowls of the air; for it repenteth me that I have made them. But Noah found grace in the eyes of the LORD. These are the generations of Noah: Noah was a just man and perfect in his generations, and Noah walked with God . . . The earth also was corrupt before God, and the earth was filled with violence. And God looked upon the earth, and, behold, it was corrupt; for all flesh had corrupted his way upon the earth. And God said unto Noah, The end of all flesh is come before me; for the earth is filled with violence through them; and, behold, I will destroy them with the earth” (KJV).
We sit and sleep in the lowest level
And he that taketh not his cross,…. By the “cross”, which was a Roman punishment, whereby malefactors were put to death, are meant all sorts of afflictions, reproaches, persecutions, and death itself; and particularly the ill will, hatred, and persecution, of near relations and friends, which must be expected by such, who bear a faithful testimony for Christ. Every minister of Christ, or professor of his name, has “his” own cross, his own particular afflictions, appointed by God, and laid on him by Christ, and which he should cheerfully take up, and patiently bear, for his sake. The allusion is to the custom of persons sentenced to be crucified, to carry their own cross, as Christ did his, and Simon the Cyrenian for him; and which our Lord here may have a respect unto, as well knowing what death he was to die, and that some of his disciples also would die the same death: wherefore Christ says,
1) The welfare of the orphans come first
And that 1988 Card is:
Here's to 2012, a new year of blogging and marriage and life!
And the passengers
I promise a happier post tomorrow, but I was working on applications for grad school and needed some inspiration/some reminders of what I want to do - and I want to share this: Thick Dumpling Skin.
As expected, Maseo's production here dazzles me.. so layered and bouncy.. it's that intoxicating De La funk that my life's been missing.. just dope shit man.. and I guess he sees something in young Miller.. if that be the case, so be it..
I love their stuff. They have the cutest church themed printables. They also have some adorable holiday stuff. Well... I was invited to be on their "Creative Team". I get to share some of their cute products with you each month. This month... of course... is Valentine's Day.
-”What are you doing here ?.”
But at the end of the day......I don't know for sure.
She blurted the first name that came to mind. “Sonja.”
Although I have not been pleased with every recipe I've tried from Gluten-Free Vegan Comfort Food, there is certainly enough that has turned out well to convince me to try my hand at more of O'Brien's comfort food creations. Pizza, Vegetable Potpie, and Tempeh Tacos are just a few of the recipes I have eagerly bookmarked. Truth be told, it's difficult to pass up any comfort food recipe, so I may end up cooking through the majority of the book sooner than expected! I know I won't exclusively be cooking gluten-free fare in the near future, but I'm happy to have this book as a guide during my occasional avoidance of gluten.
A lof of you who read this blog are in the same circles as I am, so you probably already know of this terrible news. I learned a few hours ago that Howard Hopkins has passed away. Howard had just turned 50 and apparently died of heart failure.
Christianity Today: “Imagine Ani DiFranco doing worship backed alternately by the ambient Hammock and Middle Eastern and African instrumentalists.” Read more…
If there is one thing the Internet loves, it’s lists. Top 10, top 3, even top 7! The Internet is crazy about lists, and I’m willing to bet that so are you. It makes sense that the Internet is in love with list-making. It’s easy to understand, not too much text and usually comes with funny pictures. As a result of that epiphany I give to you: The List of Japanese Lists!
Something Like Fate has been the only title that’s come to me quickly. I just knew it was the best title for this book right from the start. Usually, it’s easier for me to write an entire book than to think of a good title. When It Happens and Take Me There originally had different titles. And it took a while to decide on Waiting for You.
Day 1: Who are you? Share as little or as much about you in general.
509 **D-V/11-15(B)/1956. “The Grand Marshal of the World: On Dante’s Divine Comedy.”.Fundamentals Examination, The Committee on Social Thought, The University of Chicago, Chicago, Illinois. (Incorporated in Item C-2001 (6), above, pp. 261-70.)
Keep a humble, grateful attitude, combined with firm forward movement and communication, and you will get there.
The White Blow may have been formed at the intersection of two large fault lines resulting in its larger, cylindrical form.
MIC Youth secretary C. Sivarraajh said the movement, in cooperation with Koperasi Buku Malaysia Berhad, was planning to organise a debate on the subject at Rumah University, University Malaya on Jan 26.
Sage pork sausage links wrapped in bacon.
We now know that any boost of equality has an almost magical multiplier effect. Improvement also improves crime rates, obesity, marriage durations, educational achievement, teen pregnancy, and practically every other social measure imaginable. Likewise, falling equality makes everyone, rich or poor, worse off. Equality is essential if we are to have a true democracy, and Living Wage laws make it happen.
Cas Lowood has inherited an unusual vocation: He kills the dead.
-both to the outside again.
Happy Thursday, lovelies!
A woman with three beers in her can indeed install a wireless network in her home.
Don't Go Near The Indians (1962)
Dream Island Blogger Template is good travel blogger templates with blue and
Her husband has a shot at the Democratic nomination for President of the United States of America.
Team Endura – British Team
To ensure that you don’t run dry in the field, you can pick up an inverter that you can plug into your car’s outlet and charge your batteries up – I’ve used one with great success on week long trips with lots of taking pictures in between.
He actually completes me.
“If they make me laugh,” she says, “I’ll follow them back.”
Well family, I love you all! Thank you for being the best family ever!!
So what do we do? Turn to the Constitution of course! Our government has became too big. They have used the Constitution as toilet paper! Bigger government equals a bigger suspension of our liberty! Bigger government equals more corruption and divisiveness in our beloved country! Individual liberty and responsibility, Constitutionally-limited government and rule of law are principles this country was founded on! Time to get back to the basics before we do ourselves in!
Further, I've never heard tell of anyone who was able to convince someone to switch parties simply by arguing politics with them over a beer or three.
As for my IBS, what do you do when you can't eat hardly anything??You lose close to 15 pounds!! I need to lose a lot of weight but didn't plan on doing it this way.....
“We are talking now about God in the Aspect of the Absolute. God has revealed Himself, including, in the form of the dense matter. So it is also God! All is God!
4. High Fidelity
The presence of absence signifies complexity. Holding, and living with, complexity seems challenging for us humans. It is also makes engaging stories.
…most complaints about the American 1% are not grounded on the view that the global political economy is a comprehensive web of exploitation. It’s based on the supposition that the domestic 1% is guilty of something or other the domestic 10 or 30 or 50% isn’t, and therefore deserves to be a target of scorn in a way the 10 or 30 or 50% does not. But, however you slice it, it’s going to be true that a lot of people in the top 1% got there in pretty much the same way a lot of people in the top 30 or 50% got there.
His name is Eric Adjetey Anang, and he is a Fantasy Coffin maker from Ghana. He did a presentation on his work and history on Monday, which was absolutely fascinating. One of the Wood faculty, Michael DeForest, actually did a residency with him in Ghana at one point, and for the rest of the week they have been working together to make a smaller scale model of a Fish Coffin.
Julian is as upper class as you can get, but the story is told from the point of view of Julian's best-friend and beautifully named, Adam Hazzard, who is himself a very endearing if not somewhat naive chronicler. While Julian has had every comfort in life Adam comes from what is the indentured servant class that has developed, which is essentially the middle class of this era. Julian and Adam have grown up together as teenagers being tutored by the same man to give Julian a companion for his studies. The beginning of the story is set in a remote part of the Americas where Julian is being safe guarded from his Uncle the President Deklan Comstock, who is also responsible for killing Julian's father. From there we roam across the East of America, which is only a glimpse of this rich world.
Or American fellows
My mother is also the queen of creativity and I have to credit her for laying the foundation of a richly creative life for me. In fact, my mother is actually quite the artist. She can whip out a pretty wonderfully stylized caricature of any one of us siblings, and it is dead on. She also is an amazing seamstress and I grew up with her at the sewing machine, like pretty much non stop. She made us ALL of our Halloween costumes, and remember when I said she has 9 children? Well I'm not kidding you when I say that she made all nine of us costumes, year after year (OK we did re-wear costumes from Halloweens in the past at times, but you can bet at least 3 new ones were made every year. In fact we knew we had to put in our order early if we wanted ours to be priority. And even still, she usually whipped them all out one or two nights before the big day).
Are you familiar with the Hero-gram? It often becomes popular around the time of big events like the Olympics, the World Cup and the Aryan Purity Games and allows young whipper-snappers to send messages of support to their sporting heroes. My concept takes that idea and turns it around and shakes it vigorously and kills a dog and makes it better than the original concept. I call it Zero-grams. It gives people a chance to send messages not to heroes, but to losers and nobodies and foreigners. So, for instance, if you’re cut off in traffic by an Asian woman, instead of getting angry, you just open up the Zero-gram app on your phone (while you’re still driving, if you like – this isn’t Communist Russia, after all) type in your message – “You add no value to society apart from insurance premiums” for instance – and then using a series of algorithms and Google privacy short-cuts and maybe some magic or something (I haven’t really got to the ins and outs yet), the app sends that message to your target in the form of a text message.
As a beginner, am learning a lot from the various talented bloggers whose writing craft I admire and envy! And am always humbled by their kind words.
Their discography was as scant as it was rare, but that very obscurity helped build their underground legend through word of mouth, until a double-CD retrospective was finally issued several years after their breakup. By that time, most of the members had moved on to other, better-known emo bands, most notably Joan of Arc and the highly successful Promise Ring, which helped spread Cap'n Jazz's influence far beyond their original audience.
12. Freedom's Not a Korean Word
Today was my very first day of student teaching! I have been so nervous for this day and am happy to report it was my best first day of school ever! I have never felt more welcome at a school than I do this one.. by both the my teacher, the staff and the students. I felt right at home as soon as I entered the front doors of the school and knew immediately that it was going to be a wonderful semester!
We all know too well the importance of money. This is why we need to spend it wisely. As much as possible, we look for ways in which we can buy anything at a discount or at a cheaper cost. We are already used to buying our personal and basic necessities and so it is already easy for us to make a wise purchase; but if we are to buy for industrial and business use, we tend to get a little more undecided about where to buy them so we don’t end up spending too much.
They are ever changing and truly have so much to say. Each face tells its own story.
Because the first year at secondary school is always the worst.
So last week you might have seen a little spat that @Alex_486beowulf and I had on twitter. Somehow he got it in his outdated-microchipped-head that he was the one going to take over the world. And that suddenly I was the minion and not the other way around.
This was a few minutes before she freaked out. She started to get scared. びっくりする数分前。怖いと思い始めるように。
Their theories and the incessant talking about memories and feelings are all stabs in the dark to help us, but in the end, futile without us. I have lost the naive belief in external cures. I am much more in awe of the human brain now though, and how it reacts to the blows of reality. I will never venture to judge again...
Just a little cooperation and willingness to prioritize?
she can’t help herself
So that was our FIRST day of school....who's up for round two??!!!
Yet, there is (naturally?) no mentioning of surplus fees for rush jobs.
The real surprise of the day was the George Peabody Library, formerly the Library of the Peabody Institute of the City of Baltimore, which opened in 1878, designed by Baltimore architect Edmund G. Lind. I was familiar with the area because my associate Hector Alexander Samada had completed an interior design project on the top floor of a Romanesque Revival townhouse just on the other side of the Washington Monument. But I had never been inside the library, a research facility open to the public, now part of Johns Hopkins University.
Googly by Jeremy C. Shipp
Would have been ok if I hadn't had a job offer the day before that I'd let go of because of his answer. Ahem.
His story touched me yesterday when he told me about it. Today, at the end of the day he teared up, as we were preparing to go. He spoke of how lucky he was to have found her.
The case itself has a few parts: The mouth, which is the open end that the bullet is inserted into, and in the case of "bottleneck" cartridges, the neck and shoulder; the walls or body, which are the sides of the case that hold the powder charge, and bear against the firearms chamber (the part of the gun that actually holds the cartridge while it is being fired. It's at the end of the barrel closest to the magazine of the gun); and the head (which includes the primer pocket, and the extractor groove or rim) which is thicker and heavier than the rest of the case to accept the primer, to handle the pressure of firing, and to handle the mechanical stresses of feeding the cartridge and extracting the case after firing.
one must come to realize,
Equally as important are the people currently living in the hospital. The refugees living in the squalid, concrete construction are given the opportunity to describe and explain their hardship. Many of them, of course, were present throughout the years of the Lebanon conflict. It is here that the ‘before and after’ structure of the film gives each retelling of events a deeply emotional core – it’s one thing to see a man lose his son to war, but to witness how it has affected him 25 years on is something even more tragic.
I waited for another 15 minutes but there was no change in the light conditions so decided to cross the bridge and watched the fibre optic lights on the other side.
Being John Malkovich has its moments. My favorite performance in the film is by, no, not Cameron Diaz, silly, but rather Orson Bean, who is never less than funny as the bizarre company head who it is later revealed to have a somewhat wearisome connection to the Malkovich portal, and I'm grateful to at least Jonze for introducing me, as far as I can remember, to Catherine Keener. And by far the most interesting thing about the film is where it's willing to leave John Malkovich himself. Malkovich is also extremely good in what in concept must seem like an entirely bizarre role, but which he quite effortlessly racks it up as another in a long line of calmly, smartly and articulately intense performances. But anyway, the film leaves Malkovich as Malkovich in a place that is fairly ballsy -- people who play themselves in movies are not often made to portray themselves being so thoroughly destroyed, as Malkovich is here. But of course, the film sort of carves itself out a door, there, by naming Malkovich John Horatio Malkovich, not the real Malkovich's real full name. It's unclear to me why Jonze and/or Kaufman (or Malkovich?) would consider it necessary to hedge their bets in this way, but it of course has the effect of slightly undermining whatever effect Malkovich's fate had achieved. But then again, this is one of those movies That Says A Lot About Identity, so maybe this is just part of that. Except, however discerning my taste for post-modernism, I always liked the whole Malkovich angle here, and would have vastly preferred it if Kaufman and Jonze had not fucking winked their way through that, something that is already one massive wink, as well. In any event, just as a by the way on the topic of celebrity, Being John Malkovich extends its approach to the subject beyond Malkovich himself (or, you know, "himself"; rarely has a film been more filled with quotation marks) to include a few other celebrity cameos -- for jokes! -- and while I'm not against this very popular custom in theory, I'm beginning to think I am in practice, because never before has it left me with such a sense of spiritual deflation as when Charlie Sheen and Sean Penn suddenly show up here.
4. Canon LP-E8 Spare Battery.
To maintain her wealth and fame, Donatella Versace had to create a hybrid child during a Satanic sex ritual between her and twenty lizard boys. The female child was switched in the hospital with a child from a common family in New York and named Stefani Joanne Angelina Germanotta.
Think all of this Bug out bagging is wrong. Go take your 72 hour kit and stay away for 96 hours. Don't head to the woods go to the shittiest neighborhood you can find in the dead heat of summer, locate and abandoned building and lie low. Then by comparison do a 96 hour drill at your domicile. Shut the power off, shut the water off and hunker down for four days. Either way you come away enlightened.
I’m beginning to get that same sort of feeling about this whole self publishing world a lot of writers, myself included, have been occupying. Now, I’m only about 16 months into this self publishing thing, but it’s already getting quite tiresome.
Dr. Hightower recommended a colonoscopy, but we both agreed that since I had a colonoscopy a year earlier at the VA in Poplar Bluff and that report was everything was normal that it must just be IBS. It turns out IBS's greatest catalyst is stress, and I was under a great deal of stress because of how badly I felt. The Lexapro began to kick in after a month and I could actually feel the dark cloud lifting, however it still didn't do much for the pain and symptoms I was encountering.
At its unleashed peak — as first heard on 'Birthday' — Björk's singing communicates an ineffable alloy of mixed-emotions, a mad jumble of astonishment, elation, rapture, dread, awe. Debut is drenched with just this goose-pimple-inducing stuff. The title of 'Violently Happy' captures the Björk effect perfectly: a gush and rush of euphoria, a tidal wave of oceanic feeling. Over the song's brisk house beats, Björk stammers as she struggles to express feelings of excitement so intense she seems on the brink of leaping out of her skin: "I'm driving my car too fast with ecstatic music on/I'm daring people to jump off roofs with me." In the end, she and Mr. Hooper resort to studio wizardry to gesture at inexpressible feelings, sampling one syllable and turning it into a stuttering vocal tic.
How? The camera is facing the wrong way!
My gut is never wrong. I can trust her. She was designed to protect me and when I listen to her, she does an excellent job! Sooo simple.
Remove from the water using a skimmer or large spoon, and place them on a half-sheet pan lined with parchment paper.
By which I mean the new internet is coming tomorrow.
Look, I get that courier driving sucks. But if you choose to have it as a job, then take some fucking responsibility and deliver the package to the right address! THAT IS YOUR WHOLE JOB! If you can’t do it, then you deserve to be fired, and the company who hired you be held responsible and reimburse any loss plus damages.
But this one, to crib a phrase from Ian Fleming, "has the delivery of a brick through a plate-glass window." Modern, worldly-wise, and politically correct "journalists" (note the floating quotes) would call such an unabashed celebration of rock music over jazz, mambo, tango, and conga to be "rockist," whatever the Hell that even means. The dopes who throw that word around can't even seem to agree.
...Whisper an "I love you" to your maker.
The book is hit or miss. But the hits? Worth reading.
This blog is a new beginning. A chance to speak of the technical aspects of my photography, my inspirations, my hopes for the future and the process of taking my hobby to another level. This is a beginning, from buying a camera (since someone was kind enough to steal the one I had in Cambodia) to choosing the right lens (since that same person helped himself to my best ones as well lol) to selecting locations and so on and so forth.
a painting I made for the upcoming show at a friend’s bike shop. the show is entitled BIKE PORN. this took approximately 15-20 hours to complete. it’s working title is “fuck yeah”, although I’m hoping to come up with something better before the date of the show.
And so begins a new year.
More info at 775-337-1717 or sparkskiwanis@gmail.com
It’s also worth recalling the attack against the NDL member in Bergen at the start of the year, the threats made by AFA against the NDL in Bergen in February, and the very serious threats made against the FrP (Progress Party) parliamentarian Christian Tybring Gjedde following the 22/7 attacks. Plus of course all the other violent attacks against conservatives in Norway carried out by “anti-fascists” in the last few decades.
This is my all-time favorite book EVER, as in of-the-read-it-to-tatters variety.
Needless to say, K has been busy in the kitchen with all this baking!
7. Plastic Bertrand 'Ca Plane Pour Moi'
Hello there!
Other interior touches on the dudded-up Range Rover Evoque include semi-aniline leather with a hand-finished baseball stitch detail. The natural-grain leather also covers the door inserts, armrests, and console storage bin lid. The floormats are made of mohair, and the headliner is finished with micro-suede material. The Evoque Special Edition also comes with its own four-piece luggage set lined with the same micro-suede as the headliner. The sound system is a 17-speaker, 825-watt system by British audio specialist Meridian.
I have pictures for you and stories, and recipes, but they will have to wait. Send healing thoughts my way. I need this toe to get better in five days or else they'll have to escort me to the departure gate.
-FRIDAY-
Perhaps those two sentences are a logical impossibility. Only one of them can be true.
In the area of underpants humour John Cleese was sadly lacking.
- sailor boy gone bad
This is the flower of the grass of Parnassus, aka a bog star - not quite such a glamorous name, so I shall stick with the Parnassus name. Parnassus is, of course, a mountain in Greece, sacred to Apollo and home of the Muses, perhaps. This photo was not taken in Greece, or anywhere near Greece for that matter, but in Denali National Park in Alaska, at the base of the slopes of Mt. Denali. Spectacular place, with stunning scenery and wildlife, although I can't really recommend the weather, at least not in July !
And I'm still standing here
Spain’s economy officially entered its second recession since 2009. Gross domestic product fell 0.3 percent. Spain’s government is struggling to convince investors it can narrow the budget deficit by 3.2 percentage points of GDP this year as the economy shrinks and unemployment approaches 25 percent. The government forecasts an economic contraction of 1.7 percent in 2012 and an expansion of 0.2 percent in 2013 thatwill leave the jobless rate at about 24 percent.
They went out twice and then he disappeared. Suddenly she was unable to get through to him on the phone and her emails were not returned. After twelve months of silence she got an email from him that said “I can’t stop thinking about you”. Well, this friend of mine is no fool, she deleted the message without responding and will continue to do so if he should contact her again.
“Ron”: What are your needs? Let’s start there.
I have reviewed the entire run of The Wild Wild West series at Eye of Polyphemus. It is one of my childhood favorites. It seems only fair to review this travesty of a film adaptation for the sake of thoroughness. Whether you like the original series, if you enjoy this movie, I probably do not like you as a person.
I feel like fighting discrimination often places the fighter in the role of being a victim. That is the essence of the thing . . . someone done me wrong, and I want to change the world so they cannot do it again. In that role, one is powerless, and hoping to gain power. While discrimination fighters have accomplished great things, I feel like I want to act in a more immediately positive way in my own life. That means I support the fight against discrimination but I choose a path where I am accepted, because that make me feel ok right now.
Fast forward a few years, my husband had been teaching automotive at SUU for a couple of years, and my youngest child was entering first grade. I was ready to go back and finish my endorsement. A few phone calls later I learned that I was far enough with my endorsement that I would be student teaching at the end of my youngest child's second grade year. I wasn't ready to leave him with a babysitter quite yet, so I added the elementary ed endorsement. The education department wisely counseled me to just do the elementary ed endorsement, realizing it would be easier for me to be hired.
Viral shedding is common among OPV vaccinated persons and those inoculated with attenuated live viruses. The attenuated viruses become more virulent after residing in the vaccinated person’s body. Upon excretion, water and materials exposed to the urine or stool has been known to spread this now more virulent polio virus to others.
Though no easy effort, Skloot tells us this story. She explains the science, lays out the ethical debate over tissue sampling, and tells of the scientific victories that came from the He-La cells. That alone would have been a strong book. But the story of Henrietta and her descendents is just as powerful. We meet Deborah, Henrietta’s youngest daughter, and Skloot’s writing about her is honest and stark and passionate. Deborah is poor, struggles with mental and physical health problems, and is tortured by a lack of understanding of the connection between Henrietta and the He-La cells. Skloot and Deborah bond in an uneasy but beautiful friendship and so we get to know Skloot also. Anytime an author inserts him or herself into a story like this, readers should be skeptical. It worked in this instance—how she earns the trust of Deborah and Henrietta’s other descendents is its own marvelous story. (By the way, Skloot’s personality shines through in the “Acknowledgments”—very charming comments about her friends and family and the gratitude she expresses to those who helped her with this story.)
So, did reading A Clockwork Orange turn me into a sociopathic criminal? It might have, if I hadn't been so busy trying to figure out what the hell it all meant (I didn't realise that there was a Nadsat glossary in the back of the book until I finished the damn thing!) And did reading page 36 of the Godfather make me want to don a pink polyester bridesmaid dress and run off to find a brutal and beefy son of a gangster? Only for a moment.
It’s all in there, written up for everyone to see if they care to look.
Doesn’t it just sum it up? Poll ratings are the biggest issue and the people running the country are not very clever.
It isn’t really that I have road rage as much as my vocabulary has become a lot more colorful since moving down here, as have my hand gestures. Granted I haven’t lived in “America” for over 10 years but still… I cannot believe that people are REALLY THIS STUPID!
B. The Confirmation Of This Covenant By Isaiah 61:8-9 And Ezekiel 37:21-28
Any thoughts on this much appreciated.
Colin was introduced to me as the “music guy” in the break room of the firm on my first day. I took exception to this immediately (of course). My “mentor” was a tool and I unfairly assumed Colin was as well by extension. I learned otherwise, but it took a while – not that you need my advice (rock star architect), but you should get loud. You’ve got a voice. Artistically. Architecturally. Emotionally.
Juvenil C is our latest champion, joining Juvenil B and Castilla in the winner’s circle. The first team should be next, no? Juvenil C won their group with five matchdays left and a stellar record of 25-2-2. In addition, they are the highest scoring team in the group with 106 goals and the least scored upon team, having only allowed 27 goals.
Sleep is something you much have learned from your mama - there are nights you sleep 15+ hours! You won't go without a bink and Sebastian the seahorse. Makes me nervous. When you're tired you will pick up a bink or cry at the crib, then lie down in the middle of the floor.
Before I share the journal entry she wrote, she wants to make sure that you understand where her heart was and what she was thinking at the time she wrote this. You see, she’d been praying for years for God to change her husband. She wanted God to make her husband into a man who was worthy of her. But after four years of praying this and receiving no answer from God, she changed her prayer for the next two years. She felt he was “dead weight” and was holding her back from her potential to becoming the most holy and perfect woman alive.
like a twinkling leading me to Nazareth,
But.whatever.I'm.still.dealing.
09-Blues All Day Long
Last week I’ve been in a Winter School and one of the students I talked to said he did not care at all about this. If he was aware that the money saved could go into his benefit maybe his point of view would change.
Tile installation: $477
-Layer a tray with vanilla wafers and then sliced bananas.
Thanks to Whoopdi Friggin Doo!
All I am, take my hand;
If you would like me to do a color analysis for you (includes blog feature with pictures and customized color shopping list with your own personal power color) that will bring out your own unique glow, contact me at glowingcolor@gmail.com for rates.
So even though I have consciously rejected those ideas, my self-defense mechanism still kicks in, I think, and makes me feel as though I am tempting fate. It is something that I will have to be conscious of.
so, I do HOPE that this kind of thing will NOT come true but will fade into past as nothing more than a “conspiracy theory”, as MSM vigorously try to brand it. I wish all of us in this new 2010 year and all other years to come that such things never happen, that economy will improve and global crisis ends, that wars are no more, that children are not hungry, that mothers have their caring husbands and people their caring governments. I wish all of us all those good things, although am ashamed that I have even to wish such things which MUST BE normal, “by default” (speaking in computer terms) – but unfortunately these things nowadays increasingly become in the area of WISHES.
2-3 pounds of whatever veggies you like (2-3 pounds uncooked if you're going to roast them for this recipe, or about 3-4 cups of already cooked leftover veggies/beans/etc)
“that a child is receiving suitable education at home, and the Assessor”
Vera Farmiga’s Higher Ground. I was so impressed and touched by this film about a woman’s life as a Christian that I’m still vexed I didn’t take the time to write about it extensively. Farmiga isn’t a showy director, letting instead the story take center stage. She stars as Corinne, a young woman whose faith grows stronger as she and her husband build their family and become part of a hippie-ish community of strong Christians during the 1970s and 80s, including the earthy Annika (Dagmara Dominczyk, below) with whom Corinne has a rich and happy friendship. For many of these years, her faith gives her a deep sense of self and identity.
So, in light of this, on Christmas morning, we woke to find the ocean covered with mist and a fine dizzle falling....two hours later we were on the beach in perfect weather with sun and sand bright with summer. In the first photos you can see the heavy bank of cloud on the horizon...when we see something like that we know...watch out, something is coming! By the afternoon, we had what you see in the bottom photo...black clouds, a heavy oppressive atmosphere and a heck of a thunderstorm....the lightning struck an area in the village, and our lights went out and we had no power! It took 6 hours to sort out whatever it was that was fried by the lightning, so we spent the evening at Pete's house (some of the houses in the area still had power, others not...go figure?). Earlier this year, a massive amount of damage was done to the East Coast when incredibly strong winds and rain, virtually washed away roads and flooded malls and homes....it really was dreadful.
4. Keep a poem in your pocket.
I used SU matchboxes but you can use any box as long as it is like a matchbox.
Romans 9:18 Therefore hath he mercy on whom he will have mercy, and whom he will he hardeneth.
"To Sing a Song of Murder" (2/23/70)
I went in for the second half of the test on December 2nd and it was a pretty uneventful day. I had to be injected with more radioactive dye and then wait for 45 minutes and then be photographed for another 45 minutes in the machine. The technician told me that I should hear from my doctors office by the following Friday.
From Wendy: My all time favorite inspirational book? – The Princess Bride by William Goldman. I probably have a dozen copies of it (including one in French). I’ve read it out loud to my babies, I even have a copy of it on my Kindle. Where I go, the Princess goes.
We stand on the eve of Zimbabwe’s independence day commemorations and I cannot bring myself to embrace the celebratory mood that others seem to have. After all what is there to celebrate when the oppressed (under colonial rule) have become the oppressors (black Zimbabweans suppressing black Zimbabweans). Such freedom where others are more índependent’ than others leaves a bitter taste in my mouth.
As I age, after each birthday, I notice that my body betrays me more and more. I can no longer keep the svelte figure I had in my youth. My digestion has changed: it doesn't like ice-cream, pizza, cakes, any indulgences. I used to spend hours cleaning and organizing the house. Now, my strength and flexibility are so unreliable that I barely do an hour of housekeeping before I collapse. (I do housekeeping as an aerobic exercise, pushing and lifting and moving the whole body!). I sleep in spurts. I read and write in spurts too.
I heard that they had a homebrewer's corner starting on this social. I'm all about getting rid of some of my beer. I brought four growlers but only served three. I served Vroom-Vroom TurboKitty (an Abita Turbodog clone), my Spiced Holiday Ale, and my Bavarian Doppelbock. I had a growler of my Bohemian Red along, but this beer is a rarity. I might not be able to make it for a year or so. I want to savor it properly. I think that the Saaz Sladek was still in supply. I may try to use it all through and see how it comes out.
“Ah yeah, all four and they are close to brand new.” I said starting to feel irritated at his questions.
The SCORE association (Service Corps of Retired Executives) is a non-profit association with 389 chapters in locations throughout the United States. Local chapters provide free counseling and low cost workshops in their communities. SCORE members are experienced business experts who are presently working or are retired business executives, business owners or operations managers. They have received specialized training in counseling and mentoring. SCORE members are trained to serve as business counselors. They mentor to the aspiring entrepreneur and business owner. SCORE's volunteers provide general business advice on: How to Start a Business Writing a Business Plan Market Potential Assessing Capital Needs Cash Flow Management Types of Organization Buying a Business or Franchise Keeping Records Insurance Needs Selling a Business
Other than losing one’s job, what are the biggest threats to a person’s financial well­being? In reviewing the statistics cited above we learned that 49 percent of all home foreclosures were caused in part by a medical problem and that fully 62 percent of bankruptcies are due to a critical illness. I don’t need a house to fall on me to come to the conclusion that had these people had some form of asset protection against the advent of a critical or chronic illness they might have been able to survive financially.
Eh, I'm not going to overthink it. The bottom line is, I find this peachy flavor addictive, and it keeps showing up in my beer fridge. I'm not sure it's a taste that immediately says "Christmas" (or whatever winter holiday you prefer) but it's definitely says Texas, and I'm good with that.
Oklahoma A&M has its very own Prince Hal in Sean Sutton, the sickly and aged-before-his-time heir apparent finally took the throne from Sutton I during the Great Abdication. While Sean has shown some flashes of the greatness of Eddie, his Big12 record speaks for itself. While a win at Baylor and a strong showing in the Big12 Tourney may prove this humble writer wrong, we believe that the true coaching genes in the family were passed not to Sean, but to Oral Roberts coaching phenom Scott Sutton.
That failing of the BBC was a failing of the cozy and sleazy relationship between big-name PR companies and big-name media.
Talking of mean, I mean…why didn’t the photographer have the heart to tell me that grape really isn’t ‘my’ colour and that pouchy pockets on a blouse isn’t a great look on the well-endowed and that what I thought were nice jeans look like jodhpurs? And that skinny jeans really should be tucked into boots, not dragged over them. Men, huh?
OK, enough of this. I've tried it but it's just not working. There's love, and then there's the IDEA of being in love. I was in love enough with the idea of Pendragon Hold as a place I wanted to write about to do it, and do it well, for quite some time, but times change, I have changed, and I can no longer do this concept justice, not with all the baggage I've collected and all the angst that has built up inside of me. This series of blogs was written while I still had the ability to selectively chronicle events that lent themselves to being aired in public, while keeping those "other things we should not talk about" stuffed away in their dark, dank closets. It never bothered me all that much when some anonymous reader felt it necessary to inform me as to how bad a writer I was, but when a family member takes issue with something I write, usually out of context, and bludgeons me over the head with it, then I have a problem. I KNOW I am not a "writer", and never said I was, only that I love writing, and it's one of the last things I have left now that gives me any real pleasure, so if I'm going to continue doing it, I will have to do it under a more remote format. Thus, I am putting to rest these chronicles for good, in order that from the ashes my phoenix might arise and through it's good graces save my soul from the ravages of utter despair.
· They believe in the organization of apostles under pre-eminent apostles
Assigning Software
flesh from the draft of honesty.
A Happy New Year to everyone! I have been reading other blogs and see that there are many good intentions and New Year Resolutions being aired! I started this week with a frenzy of sorting, tidying and decorating.
"I can't find Season in your address book."
1 tsp chili pepper flakes
rushonrock: Obviously you’re a very visual band. How important is that for the band?
However, in the first eight years (of peace) of the new democratic dispensation, under the ANC, an average of 24 206 murders were committed each year.
give up their jobs and take this other work.
Spoken like a true family man.
The whole idea is to raise a may pole on May 1st to welcome spring. A may pole is a large tree trunk of a pine or birch but without the branches. On top of the may pole is a small pine tree decorated with ribbons, figurines, or other decorative things that are specific to the town.
At Door Price: $20.00 US Dollars.
Even when fault isn’t my own
The very first item in NATM’s mission statement is “improving trailer safety and performance.” The move to make participation in the compliance verification program a requirement of membership sent a strong message to Washington. In a letter to NATM President Gary Potter, FMCSA Administrator Anne Ferro wrote, “This new membership requirement clearly demonstrates the industry’s dedication and commitment to improving trailer safety.”
Still, what do I know? Disposable incomes falling fast, unemployment rising daily, Sure Start Centres closing, libraries shutting, sports facilities being priced out of reach of many, riots on the streets, budgets slashed, savage cuts in welfare, waiting times increasing, prices increasing, economic growth static, inflation rising and Libya alone costing us £1.5million a day........that's about £270million so far .......we've
I turned into where Taylor signs used to be when I heard a mighty crash.
In other great news, my husband FINALLY started his job this week. (THANK YOU, Jesus!!) With hubby off working long hard days, I'll have a lot more time on my hands to blog about my life and loves, instead of all the cuddling and watching episodes of "Chuck" that I have been doing for the last month. ;)
So, Jamesy and I visited our cousin Emily and little cousin Ava, who is already 7 1/2 months old!
Remain Blessed
And nests sprawled the spring in the cup of Yuhamin
Allegra, you are our little superstar and we love you beyond words!
and the hungry soul he fills with good things.
"MONEY! How do you think you can afford to come up with the money for this trip? Your still trying to sell your other house, just getting out of debt & now this? Ain't never gonna happen crazy!"
3. Buckingham/Nicks version.
Since the start of the season red Bull have been running these complex brakes ducts on the RB7. The design varies between the front and rear, where as the front bake ducts used to be the more complex, the Turkish update to the rear ducts probably balanced their complexity.
Gyling & Blending
I consider myself to be rather independent thinking. Not totally swept up in what’s popular. Not desperately looking for others approval. I consider myself to be beyond that. And I have proven myself wrong almost every day of my life…
And I am getting too old to have more babies (at least easily and relatively safely).
I remember part of my last dream from last night, which seemed to take place during the night or the evening at a fictional version of my parent’s house, and I think that the dream started outside & that it involved some running but I am not sure.
Gunasegaran died on the same day Teoh Beng Hock died last year, but because of the public outcry over Beng Hock’s suspicious death, Guna’s death was overlooked by everybody, except his sister.
“No, no. I wasn’t traveling with them. I didn’t know them until I met them on the bus.”
Jam of the day: Regina Spektor “Don’t Leave Me (Ne Me Quitte Pas)”
5. Season with some salt and pepper and serve.
It wasn't until we moved over to the slide that the naughty started creeping out.
06. Dandy In Disguise
The incident happened after Mr Wang was marched into the sitting room of his home on Nottingham’s Bestwood Estate to get cash for the burglars. He hit Shaw with the cleaver a number of times as the burglar attacked his wife and daughter.
For the next month, you are best served by playing it low key, lying in the weeds, working behind the scenes or working alone. That's because your birthday is a month away, and so you are waiting in the wings right now. Factoid. However, it also makes this an ideal time to strategize what you want your new year (birthday to birthday) to be all about. You have four weeks to think about this. Aside from the obvious deadlines of work, I generally just let life happen to me. But sometimes, I grab it by the tail, I nail it down, I give myself objectives with timetables, and I'm shocked at how much more I get done! (Can't hurt to try it.) After all, life is short -- and fat.
The article then makes a modest proposal for the structure of software product liability. The proposal has three main parts, or clauses.
The first comes from Sankt Gallen Brewery and is a 8.5% Imperial Chocolate Stout made with Goldings, Cascade, Willamette and Nugget hops. It's quite a fresh bottle from 2011, and it certainly has a lot of character around the aroma. Not exactly pitch black in appearance, but it has a very dark brown burnt sugar head on the swirl. I don't get much chocolate in the aroma, but it's there, surrounded by lots of hazelnut, dark sweet toffee and burnt toast. It's strange. It's light in the body for a beer like this, but it's so packed full of flavour, it really grabs your attention. Really easy drinking for a beer of this strenght. It's slightly meaty with small lactic creamy hints coming through, there's also some soy sauce and liqourice. A good alcoholic bitterness in the finish, but it's not overbearing and makes it quite moorish. I get a lot of bitter dark chocolate too, but not as much as I thought I would. Slightly woody in the finish with some dry coffee too. A really nice beer to start with.
To get to Machu Picchu almost everyone starts in Cuzco and absolutely everyone has to pass through the town Aguas Calientes -- also known as Machu Picchu pueblo. There are no roads to Aguas Calientes so the only options are by train or by foot. The direct 112 KM (70 miles) train from Cuzco* costs between $56 - $300 one way. Any way you look at it, this is price gouging of the highest order.
For a few minutes every morning, anyway, that's my world. And then cats meow, fish bang on tank to be fed, laundry stares and begs to be folded, dishes sit in the sink. Everything waits for me to do something. I can't remember a time when I didn't do something. I think it was when I was a teenager. I somehow recall entire days -- eight, nine hours at a time -- spent reading books. On the sofa. Oblivious to everything going on around. That might be a dream of adolescence, but it seems nice.
The card — available long before Whitney died — pokes fun at the singer’s downward spiral in recent years … “Next time you think of dating the bad boy, consider Whitney Houston.”
As has been our tradition for three years, Art and I took a day out of our Labor Day weekend to go antiquing in Bouckville with my folks. Despite Art’s insistence that only crazy people visit Bouckville after the big show has come and gone, every year I manage to find something interesting and worthwhile, and this year was not different.
No longer was he violent and dangerous but preached peace to those who were far off.
You can fetch the sick bag now.
I've been wanting to put up some pictures of my sewing space for a while. I've seen a lot of pictures lately of pristine, extremely organised spaces that people describe as messy. Well, I'm about to show you my cleaned up sewing room - this is my version of tidy and organised (which isn't really very organised or tidy...) Be warned this is a photo-heavy post!
2. Add in shrimp, any additional veggies, fish sauce and water and mix until the herb mixture evenly coats everything.
And yet, I know that this battle MUST go on until the very end; I know that some may fall and that others will be exalted in the world’s eyes….but God WILL prevail when the dust clears. Those who fall will be restored, and those who were puffed up in the world’s eyes will be laid low.
Hagrid’s hut, the kitchen at the Burrow, the Gryffindor dormitory and boy’s bedroom all follow until you find yourself at the Ministry of Magic, the statue showing Magic is Might in the centre with Dolores Umbridge’s office, the Ministry Floo’s and Malfoy Manor, with costumes from the Malfoy family and
The Irish Times previously reported that the site had been bought as an investment in 2003, four years before Irish commercial property values peaked in 2007. The buyer was a Paddy Kelly led-consortium which included John Flynn and the McCormack family and the purchase price was €25m. The Irish Times reported “planning permission was granted almost two years ago for a mixed development of 18,399sq m of offices and 121 apartments.”
Throwing Muses Bright yellow gun US
Of my Beloved have I drunk; and when I went forth
Tiara: offbrand
after I planted a row of them.
On May 7th I noted that my employee Tony told me he’d had a dream about Rob. That Rob was quite friendly toward him even though they’d never met and that Rob asked Tony “How’s it going? and Boy! I really screwed up! – nothing I can do about it now!”. Tony and I discussed his dream a bit and it seemed strange to me, but life had been very strange as of late lol!
It needs to be simple and not able to be confused with something else.
I am not sure why it had to be “newbie,” which I find a bit condescending, especially when trying to be encouraging. So I am changing it, thus making my initial statement about blogging: Do what you want!
4 slices prosciutto, sliced into small strips
Maybe it'd be better if they put it under the second tier of candy at the bottom of the box. That way it wouldn't matter and you wouldn't even have to pick it up and look at it. Where it is now, at the top of the box, you can't help but pick it up to get to the candy. Your eyes can't help see the words.
Clairvoyant of the call’s desire
The Army, which like the Marine Corps has excluded women from many jobs because of the physical demands or proximity to combat, is also studying ways to integrate women into ground combat units.
BridgePort Brewing Company / BridgePort Brewpub + Bakery Black Strap Stout
After that, I read every collection of Myths and Legends I could find; and when I ran out of Myths, I read collections of fairy-stories and folktales: the Grimm Brothers, and Jacob's English Fairy Stories, and Asbjornsen and Moe's Norwegian Stories – and Russian, Irish, Scottish, French, Italian, Polish stories – I couldn't get enough of them. And, without knowing it, I was learning an enormous amount about story-telling – 'Billy Goats Gruff', for instance, is a master-class in narrative and suspense.
The entire night consists of shots, eating, shots, dancing, shots...rinse, lather, and repeat. The students don't get vodka, but rather unlimited champagne. The dancing was a lot of fun, too and I think my students were surprised to see me bust some moves on the dance floor. What was also really cool was that the parents were just as into it! They had their own circle and really never stopped dancing either! By the end of the night, I had won a dancing competition and two awards: Best Teacher Dancer and Honorable Guest! I was pretty proud of myself.
Honestly, we haven’t changed or toned down anything from my original drafts. There was some talk of softening the decapitation scene, but then we thought – n’ah, let it stand in all its grisly glory! I’m extremely sensitive to the idea that we should never, ever infantilize children. They hate it, and are keenly aware of being spoken down to or mollycoddled in any way.
YorkSlam will aim to bring together poets from York Region and beyond. It will be the first time a monthly poetry slam series will be based in the region, bringing a community of over one million people an opportunity to show off their poetic skills and connect with artists across the country.
Thanks for stopping by today! For COMPLETE details, please be sure to visit the JustRite Inspiration Blog and for some more AMAZING samples of inspiration, please be sure to visit the following DT members:
"It's been great", said an insider penguin, "when the suits told us to jump, we had a jumping competition. I won!"
--that I loved him but he had lost my respect and it made me ever so sad and felt completely wrong
Category: Biography
i can feel it.
Mom loved words. She loved to play word games. My great-grandmother on Dad's side of the family was also a fan of word games. Mom often went to visit her in the nursing home and the two of them would play Scrabble. Grandma Belle would abruptly decide that a game was over, close up the game and announce that it was time for Mom to go home. But they enjoyed their weekly games.
Random.org picked entry number 25 who was.....
One would wonder on going to Showcase Art Exhibition if exhibitions of newly emerged artists are as lively like and full of energy, or is it the versatile artwork that decorated the walls of Café D’Artistes that give it a different look this time.
I recently took my kids to a little lake nearby to throw a frisbee and jump around. They ran up and down a hill for 30 minutes. Up. And down. And up. And down.
Matthew 7:7
HE WILL REMOVE UNGODLINESS FROM JACOB.” “THIS IS MY COVENANT WITH THEM,
Now we're just waiting for Mickey Mail! Yay!
-Picture wire (one pack is plenty)
content.)
Dogfish Head Craft Brewery World Wide Stout
I’m not trying to make an argument either in favor of or against the death penalty. That’s not the purpose of this essay. I’m not going to shed any tears over the death of bin Laden, that much is for sure. Considering the options, though, it seems as though killing him in the raid itself was the right, wise, and prudent thing to do.
We've actually touched on this myth before. Then, we had only anecdotal evidence with which to debunk it. Now there's something a bit more solid.
Merry Christmas, ya’ll!
linen shirt that I picked up at an op shop and cut
1248 ***D-V/16/1996. “The Noble and the Just.” Lenoir-Rhyne College Hickory Humanities Forum, Wildacres Conference Center, Little Switzerland, North Carolina. (Incorporated in Item B-7, above, pp. 182-91 (1997).)
For the everlasting hills
Homer: "Hello, my name is Mister Burns, I believe you have a letter for me." P.O. Worker: "Ok, Mr. Burns, what's your first name?" Homer: "I don't know..."
In Samoa, all fair hair is considered 'ena'ena, a word that is usually translated as brown, although when English-speaking Samoans use this term in reference to hair, they typically gloss it as 'blond'. This makes sense since, when one is bleaching Polynesian hair, it goes through a series of reddish- brown shades prior to arriving at blond, and even then retains a reddish hue. When describing hair, Samoans specify the actual shade of 'blond' by using certain
And here's Dorothy dressed up as the lion !
adapted from Balkan Cooking by Benny Saida
“People need to put this into some perspective,” said the official, speaking on condition of anonymity because of the sensitivity of the issue. “The vaccination campaign was part of the hunt for the world’s top terrorist, and nothing else. If the United States hadn’t shown this kind of creativity, people would be scratching their heads asking why it hadn’t used all tools at its disposal to find bin Laden.”
Grandma used to say that the police were a publican's best friend and in my experience she was right, but just like any organisation or person they are fallible. Hopefully the message has gone out throughout the land that this Judge Dredd style of interaction with licensees is not just unhelpful in our combined efforts to provide safe
What's everything and how's it coming? Some good movies delivered by Netflix? A giant check delivered by Publishers Clearing House? New shoes delivered by UPS? Money falling from trees (where I wish it did actually grow)? Some cute new clothes from a favorite store (hmmm. . . I think that means I'd have to go get those instead of them "coming" my way)?
My love is not a heavy weight
Now of course this analogy only extends so far–your pastors and teachers love to teach you the Word, and they are happy to do it.But our dependence on our guide to feed us when he thought it was time, and not when we were really hungry, I think illustrates what Hatmaker is getting at, when it comes to feeding ourselves spiritually. He continues:
(a) to bring into hatred or contempt or to excite disaffection against any Ruler or against any Government;
Africa governments are filled with terribly corrupt people; those without an iota of patriotism and sense of self-worth. And they are committed to corruption in all ramifications, turning bribery to a way of life, and simply stealing from the coffers as if they never swore an oath when coming into governance. Nepotism, tribalism, ethnic particularity and religious manipulation are often strengthened by acts of public stealing. Recent revelations involving the handling of pensions funds in Nigeria – in civil service and police force – clearly showed how public funds are mismanaged. Most of the victims who worked for many years were not paid their pensions and gratuity; most died waiting to be paid. The effects of corruptions are seen in almost every sector of the economy. Most of the manufacturing industries, for instance, have since died and unemployment is the reality of the day. Millions of qualified professionals, in every field, walk the streets, unengaged. Starvation, hunger, deprivation, exploitation, greed, and gross sensitivity are empowered by the sheer carelessness of government functionaries; hard work has given way to mediocrity. Truth and sincerity in government are no longer viable. Official falsehoods, manipulation of figures, frauds and diversion of funds are most noticeable in most African countries. The culture of waste is so pronounced that public officers are grossly nonchalant and unresponsive to public taste and interest.
Happy third anniversary to Handmade Tales! Yes, its true, its the third anniversary of this here blog!
The memorial was designed by Master Lei Yixin, a Chinese sculptor, and overseen by an American architect, Ed Jackson.
3/4 cup heavy cream, at room temperature
# 5 : Ender’s Shadow (1999) by Orson Scott Card
I actually learned to type on
It's too much, it's too little.
Just after Christmas I received an email from Ray Daniels. It was like getting a letter from a college you had applied to (I assume. I never applied to any...). I read the top and couldn't bring myself to go on. I didn't want to know if I failed, so I was ready to not know if I passed. With more curiosity than courage, I glanced down, past the word "Congratulations," to the part that had my scores. Holy cuss. I passed.
Markets were absolutely buoyant. Canadians began discovering the merits of Mutual funds and investing. For 5 years we had market returns like no other period in modern history. In cases you forget here are the annual returns of the S&P 500.
In general, I just want to devote time to things that matter. Things that I love. No more wasting time stressing. If I want to craft, I will craft. If I want to blog, I will blog. If I want to pull a piece of furniture off the side of the road, I will do it. If I want to cuddle my husband on the couch for a while instead of homework, I will do it.
Entries should be submitted as typed Microsoft word or PDF documents. There should be a title page with the following information:
Book provided by author for review.
All four of the older kids, under one roof, all on one couch, doing something together. Our little one was already in bed.
For some reason I lost my Superwoman outfit
What else I’ve bought that I have yet to touch:
But Nash had caught the King's notice in 1694 when he organised the pageant for William III and had been offered a knighthood, which he refused. The role in Bath was far more to his taste and he accepted.
Are muffins ugly?
for the colour to retain it's title as grey, because these will all produce cool tones.
The monsters in Sendak’s most famous book are actually modeled on his relatives. I know where’s he’s coming from. Some of my uncles could probably have cameos in a horror movie.
For Today formed in 2005 and has since released one EP and three full-length albums. The hardcore-influenced metal band is known for their non-stop touring, high energy live performance, and unrelenting message. Having played over 1000 shows in five continents, For Today has toured with Emmure, We Came As Romans, Winds of Plague, The Devil Wears Prada. The band headlined the Scream The Prayer Tour 2010 with Maylene and The Sons of Disaster and also was on the Motel 6 Rock Yourself to Sleep Tour with We Came As Romans this past year. To date, For Today has sold over 65,000 albums in North America. As forthcoming about their faith as they are about their musical prowess, For Today have become widely known as one of modern metal’s most technically proficient bands. For Today is Mattie Montgomery (lead vocals), Ryan Leitru (lead guitar, vocals), Brandon Leitru (bass), Michael Reynolds (rhythm guitar), and David Morrison (drums, percussion).
The inescapable conclusion is simply one of resignation. This goes against the grain of our humanity--we are accustomed to ridding the world of this or that problem (smallpox, polio, whatever), and accepting failure is anathema to us. But, to give a classic African scenario, a polio vaccine won’t work if the kids are prevented from getting the vaccine by a venal overlord, or a frightened chieftain, or a lack of roads, or by criminals who steal the vaccine and sell it to someone else. If a cure for AIDS was found tomorrow, and offered to every African nation free of charge, the growth of the disease would scarcely be checked, let alone reversed. Basically, you’d have to try to inoculate as many two-year old children as possible, and write off the two older generations.
Sometimes they are in demand when a snake enters a house. Then, they have to be called, like you would call a doctor for a house visit to see a patient who is too frail or in too serious a condition to be taken to a clinic.
Is it Friday already? Where did the week go?
This is the first time I’ve seen a transvidual subject turn into a subject, speak, and then dissolve in this way. Anyone can speak for the group, it’s a radically distributed, transvidual networked political subject. And yet it’s remarkably low-tech. While I’m sure that the human mic has existed before in history, likely invented and reinvented as need be, I’m not sure if has ever been distributed and spontaneous like this. Perhaps we needed the internet and today’s networked world to help us to see these potentials. But in a moment of crisis, this protester just said ‘mic check!,’ and in the age of crowdsourcing ideas and revolution-by-twitter, no-one had to say anything more, people just intuitively knew what to do.
This is a shot of my sewing machine...which is covered in ink and paint because I leave it out at all times, and it's just a few inches away from where I work. But, I don't mind. I love this old thing!
It pierces the heart of mine.
I feel my vocation in life is to help others.
“Yeah, I do seem to pick some wild ones. Need to find an old fashioned lady from my time… the two step kind.”
I’ve noticed that there’s something about brushing my pearly-whites that helps dissipate my desire to keep eating. Today, after lunch, I wanted a chocolate bar. I’d had plenty to eat, but the sweet sensation tug kept nagging me as I cleaned up the lunch dishes. But instead of salivating over it, I decided to instead “foam at the mouth” with a good dose of Colgate toothpaste. Followed that with a big glass of water, and the desire for something that wasn’t on my meal plan quickly vanished. Maybe it’s psychological, letting the mind and body know that the meal is done, but whatever the reason, the result kept me on track.
1. Adjust 2 oven racks to the upper- and lower-middle positions and heat the oven to 450 degrees. Line 2 rimmed baking sheets with aluminum foil and spray with vegetable oil spray. Arrange the sliced eggplant on the baking sheets, brush with olive oil and sprinkle with 1 teaspoon salt and 1/4 teaspoon pepper. Bake until light golden brown, about 15-20 minutes, rotating pans halfway through the roasting time. Set aside to cool. Leave the oven on, reducing the temperature to 400 degrees.
I can’t have both Him and me. I can’t think both Him and me. If a double minded man should not expect anything from God (James 1:7), a single minded man can expect everything from God! And that’s not greedy!
“We are tired of seeing black people being oppressed because we have even applied to reclaim this piece of land.”
Xypherous: I disagree. I have calculated the net damage and utility gained from Lulu’s abilities and-
The only reason I am going to waste any blog space on this travesty is because I am a completes. I vowed a week’s worth of Planet of the Apes posts and I aim to fill out the full seven days, too. But I absolutely despise this movie. Hate, hate, hate it. Much of my animosity has to do with my fondness for the original, but there are several other reasons.
Tim Henry ... Mr. Sutton
I’m not a big girl – the BBW is a euphemism that doesn’t apply to me AT ALL. I’m quite short & if I weren’t fat, I’d be rather small. I haven’t grown much (except sideways) since I was 11. I fluctuate between a size 14 and an UK18. I’d like to say I don’t yo-yo diet because I don’t care for dieting but sometimes I think I unconsciously watch what I eat (see how I say that like it’s a bad thing?). I pretend to complain about being fat because I feel sometimes it’s expected of me. But really, I don’t have a self-image issue (not anymore at least). Also, I think I dress pretty nicely for someone my size and height! So here goes…
I didn’t see that coming. And I remember being caught completely offguard, and incredibly sad when I read it. What the hell kind of fucked up story is that? And what is it with sadistic English teachers who assign this crap, knowing that tragedy is lurking, but completely blindsiding students with it? I went through the same shit with The Bridge to Terabithia, The Lottery, Jacob Have I Loved, The Chocolate War, and Where the Red Fern Grows (Cameron is being subjected to this right now. He knows it’s sad, but I don’t know if he knows the extent of it.).
Mel said that it looked like the fox
Methods:
Just prior to the officers arriving there, the man made threats towards the professionals who decided to withdraw for their own safety. He attempted to keep his wife within their ground floor flat whilst threatening her, but the social worker managed to grab her and pull her out fearing for her safety also. They made a further 999 call to the police who arrived almost as the 2nd call to the police was concluded.
for the world to lose the only you there is
The hall is filled with polite laughter. Wine glasses clink. Sweet perfume drifts through the air and burns my nose. Dresses made of ruffles and lace slide across the marbled floor. The walls shine like porcelain. A group of women and one man dressed in uniform stand together in front of a cage and whisper as they examine the boy inside. They eye him as though he’s a statue – a piece of art to be analyzed – and gesture and smile. The back of one boy’s cage opens and he’s pulled out, having been bought and sold. The sound of a piano spills into the hall.
Sentiments: Tim Holtz
The reason is because I Love my work.
I will keep it open til the end of May, thank you so much for all your support.
How to Spring Break Like an Adult
And his claim that the theory is independent of the means used to test it is pretty desperate too. Psychologists normally rely on "operational" definitions -- i.e. they define the concept they use BY the means they use to measure it.
What a great day! It was a grand day out. German sausage. London Pride. Curried goat. Paella. See-saws. Roundabouts. Bouncy Castles. Magic Ship. Thanks for showing your support. We had a tremendous reception and some hearty applause for the three-piece power trio line up. The road crew were watching from backstage and gave us some great comments, that means alot. Photos here: http://www.facebook.com/photo.php?pid=2411481&id=531898466#/album.php?aid=106639&id=531898466
-you showing me off at all the little diners we ate at together
Jeremy almost surrenders, when he returns one evening to find his shelter burning and the hunters awaiting him. Unbeknownst to Jeremy, his neighbors have been watching him and they have developed strong opinions about this brave little orphan. Jeremy's steadfastness and bravery have inspired them – and those who prey on children are about to be taught that this young boy is not alone in the world after all.
Now my hair can’t decide if it wants to be the color of poop or be black. I’ve tried dyeing it several pretty chocolate shades, but every color I pick comes out red. My hairdresser says that whatever color I pick, besides true black, will probably come out red because that is the natural tint in my hair. While I have no problem with red hair, it looks ridiculous on me with my black eyebrows. And, yes, I’ve tried dyeing those. They continually come out black. *eyeroll*
4. Step2 Deluxe Canyon Road Train Table
Only then, once the music began, did I allow myself the magic of studying the album's back cover and--if I was particularly fortunate--the lyrics printed on the liner. A song never hits its mark, never fully transported me from my parochial world, until I read the lyrics.
RabidPuppyDesign:
~Blessings~
PT: What are some of the factors a startup company should consider when formulating their mission statement?
In case there is anyone wondering where we have been for the last four months, let me update you. From the last post you might assume we have been busy getting our new venture off the ground. . . but no.
Don't wanna hear no alternative music
John and Kitty set two boxes beside each other and played as if they were in a car at a drive-in, located in the underground complex.
The ignorance, and apathy in the system will create the disenfranchisment of the populace away from healthcare all together. There are more and more people everyday especially males that say how they would never go to the doctor for anything because they will get sent home with more disease then they went in with.
As with any Joss Whedon work every scene is full of wit and humor (even the violent ones) and a whole mess of allusions to other works (at some point I’m going to have to go through the last act and look for every reference they make, because Goddard and Whedon seemed hell bent on referencing every horror film ever made). The problem is that the first time I went to see this movie the audience I was with clearly understood this was a comedy and was laughing at all the digs at the genre…the second time I saw it the audience clearly came for a horror movie and didn’t get the fact that their genre was being humiliated (it was odd, I was one of the maybe 5 people laughing at every scene). So the expectations you go in with drastically affect your appreciation of the film.
Despite the evidence that air quality can be improved by careful selection and siting of trees in urban areas, there is little evidence that urban greening projects take account of how air quality goals can best be achieved. Worse still, a lack of investment in the management of urban trees is undermining tree cover in urban areas.
Papers : Glitz Design, Webster's Pages
The Speed Sun from Hauck and Esprit is suitable right from your child’s birth, preferably after the third month. It is an easily reliable stroller as it looks to your baby’s comfort and safety. Extremely light weight and easy to put away, the stroller when folded becomes very compact that can easily fit in the boot of your car.
As of late designer watches have soared into great popularity, and countless people are looking ahead for these so-called designer brands. However, is it worthy to go into these highly priced designer watches? Do these watches deserve the value as investments?
Too “disappointed” to realize time on earth is too short,
Today was kind of hard. My co-author pissed me off, too. He's a strange combination of laid back procrastinator and control freak. I can deal with one or the other but both together is a rather trying combination. Then there's the dynamic of co-presenting, with him getting most of the questions, whether because it's his school or because he's male, I'm not sure.
Tomorrow is my first day of school in about three weeks; illnesses and colds plus the snow forced me to stay under the covers, but tomorrow I'm back to normal, which included me stressing about an unwritten essay early this morning. Why do I leave everything to the last minute? Plus I have a unfinished portfolio on my hands which needs to be ready for my first interview on Wednesday, woo! Excited and nervous, but fingers crossed! I have to impress, this is my top choice!
Far from the Madding Crowd
I choose to enjoy helping my family members in their personal growth, to God’s glory in Christ Jesus! Amen!
And we are working hard at it.
That mere glance of the evil, lust, and demon-possession I saw in the eyes of the actors displayed on that poster in Wal-Mart gave me a sense of spiritual oppression. I am so angry and grieved at the believers who watch these movies from Hell and, even worse, place the DVDs in the hands of their children. I could literally scream! We know God's Word, we know that this wickedness is condemned by God. Why, oh why? Why have you compromised and allowed your children to see this great evil? You might as well throw your children into the pagan fires of Molech! "There shall not be found among you any one that maketh his son or his daughter to pass through the fire, or that useth divination, or an observer of times, or an enchanter, or a witch, Or a charmer, or a consulter with familiar spirits, or a wizard, or a necromancer. For all that do these things are an abomination unto the LORD" (Deut. 18:11-12).
The base papers are among my favorites, which I have been afraid to use! Hehe. I hope she likes them as much as I do. I always love brown and pink together, and the sweet pops of red hearts are just so pretty. Both heart designs are from the SEI With All My Heart collection. I cut out an Elegant Edges frame, backed it with pink Core'dinations paper, and foam-taped it atop the diamond-heart paper for dimension. The sweet pink and white twine is Blossom from My Craft Spot, which I just LOVE. It reminds me of strawberry milk, which adds extra sweetness to this card. :o) I secured the ice cream cone with a Little Yellow Bicycle heart button, because one touch of love is all that's needed to truly brighten a friend's day. :o)
Then there is that bonus or compounding factor , i.e. the spouses of the respective leaders.
Parents to not own children. Children are a gift of love, made in the image and likeness of the Creator above, pure Divine Inspiration made into the reality of people. Children have a mind, a spirit, a soul as well as a physical body created from the Divine blueprint, which no parent owns. What an obligation parents have to the Divine Creator of all, to be responsibile with the gift of life they have been given.
Bernard HOGAN-HOWE was appointed Met in 2011. He was previously one of HM Inspectors of Constabulary, is a former Chief Constable of Merseyside and was appointed by HM the Queen on the Home Secretary’s recommendation.
Second, Boulder is a supremely active and outdoorsy place. A lot of people here get excited about mountain sports (the Reel Rock Tour Premiere at the Boulder Theater last week yielded a line of people that stretched entirely around the block--hard to imagine that happening in any other city of this size in the country. Or maybe any other US city, period). And when that happens, the alpha males (and females?) of this crowd inevitably start challenging each other and themselves to be better (faster, longer, stronger?) than they were yesterday. Mix these two ingredients with the invention and proliferation of the Internet and you've created a whole 'nother method of quantifying a culture.
to use with my computer/mouse etc.
Any way, I made a list of about 13 items as a rough goal for this Fall - Winter. So far I have two heavenly organic cotton boat neck tee shirts from Zara, black and Breton striped, very sensual but utterly nonchalant. A croc embossed vintage black leather belt with a shiny gold buckle. An exquisite ivory button down and a perfect Little Black Dress both from Anthropologie. Sturdy little heeled black brogues from....who would have thought...Aldo!!! And.........last but not the least ........in fact my most significant acquisition to date..........my FRYE Carson boots, a splurge, but as probably the only pair of walkable boots in the world that make my legs look LONGER.....they are worth every single shiny copper penny.
When it comes to planning for a wedding, everyone seems to have somewhat of an idea of what they want. They either have always dreamed of it, they were inspired by a movie scene, or someone else’s wedding. Mostly inspiration and the dream is solely The Bride’s. Groom nods his head to all the selections, colorful items and etc.
This is why I sometimes ask non-writer friends/family to read a story and tell me what they think about it. If you want to try it, you should make a list of non-leading, specific questions to ask them. Some examples are: can you describe the main character to me, or, what did you think when this character did this thing, or, what kind of thoughts did the story leave you with, or, who was your favorite character, what was your favorite scene, which characters do you not remember very well, did you ever feel confused....etc.
Its hard for a girl to look good in kevlar, and I mean that in the
day when Asgoth would come crashing down by the hands of the Light.
I see great possibilities for this as a mobile app. It’s not even a scam, you can really certify this as being the genuine Catholic article. All you have to do is find some Catholic ex-priest who needs the money. You see, the Catholic Church teaches once a priest, always a priest. Even if a priest quits, even if the Church formally defrocks him (that’s a lovely expression, isn’t it, something
Dandelion roots and leaves tend to be used in different ways in herbal medicine. The leaves, although bitter like the root, are probably most often used for their diuretic properties. (The flowers are good too by the way but they turn to fluffballs in the dehydrator so I avoid them when I am harvesting for drying.) Dandelion leaf is actually legendary as a diuretic – its French name is ‘Pis en Lit’. Best not to drink dandelion leaf tea last thing at night!
A different level is that we have things in common. I wish we could have a friendship. Like dudes. Like a bro-mance. I like to do that with hot men too – act like I am asexual and just one of the guys. Pretend I am so unattractive to men like you that I am sexless.
In prep for the Flying Pig I figured y’all would want to know the course for the half marathon. I mean why not!?
Much is magnificent out here. In some ways I suppose I became permanently southernized. That involves a certain mode of courtesy, pride, and respect. That doesn't involve race or incest or any of the stereotypes I see circulated out here in media and general culture.
“Don’t believe in it.”
Artistic talent clearly runs in the family. Mary said she encouraged Kanika's childhood interest in art. "One of the things I know I did, and I wish more parents would do, is that instead of just buying the plastic, premade (toys), we always had the crayons and the paper and the pens," Mary said.
I decoupaged the frame using papers from the Fabulous line by Simple Stories.. the decoupage is by Helmar.. one of my favourite companies for adhesive and mixed media products like the decoupage.
It's on Sunday - write it down.
Notes on Contributors / 102
Awards are open to all instructors currently teaching at a post-secondary institution, regardless of discipline, level, or term of appointment. Applications in French or English are welcomed. Candidates do not need to be members of STLHE to apply.
So we came home all tired and hot . We vegged in the AC watching TV. Catching up on the last 4 weeks of The Voice. We threw together a little chicken salad from the leftover roasted chicken and made what I call Hodge Podge Dip. I got the recipe from a friend but I have no idea what to call it . It has black beans which makes you lean toward southwestern , but then it has feta cheese too, which of course makes you think of Greece . So for me it’s Hodge Podge , but is it a dip or a salsa? You tell me . Recipe follows. It really was a great day and a wonderful weekend overall. Now I’m ready for the week and already looking forward to next weekend!
At least I'm gonna say that I tried - What's the sense in hurting my pride
Pinchbeck often tries to put a distance between himself and some of the more outlandish themes in the sense that he will rehearse the theories that crop circles in the Wiltshire countryside are the manifestation of a higher consciousness or alien attempts to communicate with humanity, before stepping back and offering a more mundane possibility.
As he settled back on the scooter and we went on our merry way, he looked up at me from under his straight blonde fringe and smiled. "It was a good try, Mum," he said. "A bit more practice and you'll be as good as me."
Of your parts
As always, it's been a super-busy summer with a never ending stream of kids, puppies, tomatoes, sunburns, cicadas, 95+ degree temps, and, of course, mountains and mountains of laundry. I love summer and the perfect blend of excitement and laziness that it brings; but when I made my way to the porch this morning to drink my coffee and to watch our hummingbirds, there was a definite crispness in the air, a hint of the fall season right around the corner. It reminded me of how much I love the fall, and harvest, and bright orange pumpkins, and the sound of crunching leaves underfoot, and......schedules.
Thank you for all of your love and support. Barry really did enjoy blogging and he looked forward to sharing all of your comments.
As we came to these passages I simply read them and made a few comments, gave others an opportunity to make a few comments and moved on.
Mushroom 65:
Inspecting the door, the Ninja discovers traps, so upstairs Darryl jumps out of the window to report back to the others. Tonks casts a Dark Bridge towards the window and, together with the Paladin and the Monk, climbs in, while the City Guards guard the building from the outside.
So what have I borrowed so far?
I, as Mayawati, would have simultaneously carried along with the “manuwadis” – the non-dalits – and would have cemented my position in the political landscape of my country. I would have ensured that my state became one of the most progressive and I would have felt extremely proud of my achievements. And, by fulfilling my roles and responsibilities as the chief minister of a highly gifted state, I would have paved my road towards the highest political seat of my country. India, with its elaborate spectrum of caste system, would have felt immensely proud of seeing me become the prime minister!
and know it will stay with us?
Little Bobby Snooks was fond of his books,
Celia Fenn
Kill him instead,
I LOVE the 'newspaper-style' graphics on the plane.
I think that by interpreting Maslow’s B-Values with intelligence and inventiveness, we can create artistic works of higher emotional impact, leading to peak experiences for the viewer, listener, reader or user. This may be an unintended application of Maslow’s ideas, or completely wrong, but I submit that this usage of B-Values as an aesthetic compass provides some useful and pleasing outcomes.
The Sisterhood hacked?
This child is obsessed with chewing gum and at first it was funny because she was like a two year old side show freak who could chew the same piece of gum for three hours and people would comment "wow, she really doesn't swallow it?"
We also saw a surprise twist in the Naomi/Jen/PJ triangle and learned something surprising about Annie’s new love interest, Caleb. Read on for tonight’s character breakdown.
Note that I’m only using Kolbe for the 4th and 6th grader. Littles continue to use mom-directed relaxed learning. So all my comments relate to using the program for people who can read competently on their own.
It was late afternoon when we packed up our cars and hit the road back to the valley. The road trip home was so beautiful and quiet.
xx. victoria.
then you get french fries!
83. "When your mama was the geek, my dreamlets," Papa would say, "she made the nipping off of noggins such a crystal mystery that the hens themselves yearned toward her, waltzing around her, hypnotized with longing." —Katherine Dunn, Geek Love (1983)
Community radio stations exist under their licenses to serve the local community and to connect with it. A larger population will self-evidently require the appropriate funding to reach out to more people. If money is being disproportionately distributed, and isn’t representing the populations it is meant to serve, something appears to be going very wrong.
Dump everything into the crockpot, and stir well. Cook on low for 8-10 hours. If your chicken was raw when you put it in, take it out after about 8 hours, shred it, and then stir it back into the chili.
Recommend? For those that love Austen and can't get enough of the variations of her books this is a must read! But I also think it's a great story about sisters and that bond that can never really be broken. It really is a good choice for anyone who loves a great love story and who wants to just get lost in the pages of the lives of likable characters!
What does suddenness have over a losing battle? Legacy with regrets. What does a losing battle have over suddenness? Time with suffering. Whatever. It’s like a losing battle all around. Yuck, I feel so human right now. So what’s it going to be, man? What would you rather be? A deer or a flower?
Haley was released today! This morning, things weren't looking promising, but by noon her oxygen levels stabilized and they sent her home. Haley is still healing up, but our happy, energetic girl is back, and boy was she missed. We have to continue to give her some medicines and do breathing treatments with a mask for the next three days, but at least she's home and away from all the machines and doctors.
I love seeing the joy of "Kissmuss" through 2 year old eyes. He will only be 2 once. He will only want me to play dinosaurs for hours for a short period of his life. He will only want to find scissors to cut anything he can for a little while longer. He will only insist I cook in the play kitchen with him and do all the cooking the way he says to for a few months more. He will only be saying the cute little things he says for a little while longer. He will only be 2 once.
I’m not one to hate
DE: What is the best tidbit of advice you can give to writers who want to combine humor and action?
What is wrong with the people, that they are weeping?
Well, there you have it. My first attempt at pie in cupcake form. I am definitely pleased with the results and I think you will be too. Give them a try! I'll definitely be doing this many more times, with different flavor combinations. The ideas are running through my head as I type. Until next time, happy reading and, more importantly, happy cupcake-ing!
The other scene that ushers Once Bitten into the uncrowded realm of the masterpiece was the Halloween dance sequence to the strains of "Hands Off" by Maria Vidal. Now, Jim Carrey and Lauren Hutton have already proven their merit in the film: Jim's physicality during the showdown in the clothing store change room and Lauren in the seduction scene of Jim at her palatial home. So I wasn't shocked by their flair on the dancefloor. I was, on the other hand, completely taken aback by the sheer foxiness displayed by Karen Kopins as Mark's frigid girlfriend, Robin Pierce. You see, up until then she was bland and mousey (and not in a hot librarian kinda way). But when she sees that a forty-something vampire, her long legs encased in black pantyhose, is making an aggressive play for her suddenly Goth boyfriend, the previously dowdy Robin unleashes a firestorm of sexual artistry and taupe pantyhose at the grievous state of affairs, and begins to thrust and contort her previously unused organic structure in all sorts of arousing directions.
Here is the wonderful Winnie! She looks a little nervous doesn’t she? Tonight I got to spend time with her as well as my friends Jenna and Annie. We had a nice relaxing evening hanging out, eating Cheesecake, and watching tv.
Forever I'll remember your loving embrace.
But will they come when you do call for them?
a = b d e g
Except for fish and stone and tree
No response to my latest KOS diary. That is disappointing.
Karina Martin Hogan, ‘The Apocryphal Apocalypse: The Reception of the Second Book of Esdras (4 Ezra) from the Renaissance to the Enlightenment by Alastair Hamilton’, The Journal of Religion, 81 (2001), 109-10.
From Eric Hoffer:
Life can make one’s soul weary, feels worse than a blocked nose on a cold winter’s night.
And Dog was content and wagged his tail.
Don't dismiss that factor in specialty beers. I expect to see more traffic in American-brewed versions of Euro-classics -- assuming American brewers continue to get better at brewing them -- and more experimentation with 'American' styles by both brewers and consumers, maybe backing off the extreme hops or at least moderating them. But I also think we're going to see even more solidification of flagship brands by craft brewers, as people 'hunker down' a bit to ride this out.
Now, as for their products, I must confess that I would not call any of Leinie's brews "great". But quite a few are good. In addition, they are reasonably priced. And because of the Miller ownership the distribution range is broader, so you may stand a better chance of being able to sample one or more in your area.
Everybody stopped. Suddenly a girl popped out of nowhere and started attacking Ethan. He used his reflexes to counter her moves and knocked her to the ground. He said, “Lady, we just want the blueprints. We need to find our friend in there. Alice Douglas.”
A Game we played: one at a time, look around the house and come back with 3 things you see that you could take initiative to make better. Mom and Dad had to name 5 things. We started with the youngest then ended with Mom (even though I'm not the oldest...ahem!) and nobody could say what someone else had already said. It was a good exercise in opening our eyes.
Kirby's Dream Land. Apparently abutting to 20 times. It was my admired bold on Bold Boy.
I had a feeling this taxi driver overcharged me. However, that didn’t stop me from booking him for the next day to take me to the temples. He offered a steep price of Rp 450, 000 (49 USD) for a whole day’s hire of his car and his services as driver. Luckily, I asked colleagues before the trip how much would be the usual price for something like that. I haggled and he gave in. I got to hire a car for less than 49 USD. (I now realize I shouldn’t be freely telling people how much I spent because it is embarrassing!)
Swifty Peeps a.k.a Brian Peters of Uncle Billy's Brew & Que has won a silver metal in the Kellerbier/Zwickelbier category for his Hell In Keller beer! Great job Swifty!
The commute wasn’t very pleasant. A kind gentleman cut me off on the freeway, causing me to berate him for a good mile or two. After parking in the school parking lot, I went to take my test. After a fiasco of forgetting my final exam number and initially filling in the wrong bubbles on my Scantron (this would only happen today), I am quite sure I failed my test. How bad was it? At the end I did the good old “eeny, meeny, miny, moe” on two questions. At this point I’ll be lucky if I didn’t fail the test.
So, was I going to make my protagonists twenty-first century vagabonds? I have to say the thought never crossed my mind. Despite slipping in the odd detail as mentioned already, there is nothing in Waiting for Godot to really pinpoint where or when it is set. There are those who would argue that the action takes place in the Wicklow hills and their arguments do have a certain validity, but it’s not important. There are those who point to every tree in Mercier and Camier and say that it prefigures the tree in Waiting for Godot, despite the fact that the man himself said he based the set of Godot on Caspar David Friedrich’s Man and Woman Observing the Moon—not that we always trust what Beckett has to say.
Things are rough right now. With the failed match, I am panicking about life. I desperately want to grow our family. E has added so much love and happiness to our lives and I want to add that again. I want E to have a sibling and I want to hold another baby. We haven’t been trying hard to get pregnant but have gone back and forth between actively TTC and NTNP Ella was a year old and no BFP since. I worry about secondary infertility and that I’ll never get pregnant again. Now, in truth, getting pregnant isn’t best for my health. It will cause things to pause (Lyme symptoms usually decrease with pregnancy) but I won’t make progress. At this point, I am so sick I’d welcome the break. So, it isn’t so much that I wish I were pregnant this second, but the thought of NEVER getting pregnant is terrifying me.
‘I know…. she is my wife!’ My loving husband responded!
Here is a video I made to demonstrate a quick pre-exercise warm up:
The market is open on weekdays from 8.00 – 18.00 and Saturdays from 8.00 – 17.00
At the dawn of civilization, Plato wrote:
How I Heard About It: I was selected as a blog-tour host for this book. A review copy was kindly provided by TLC Book Tours and the publisher.
Given how difficult it is for self-published authors to get their books into physical bookstores, I'm prepared to keep an open mind on this. But it also seems to me to skirt the borders of exploitation. (Apparently the store hit upon the fee structure as a defensive measure, after it was "inundated" with requests from self-pubbed authors.) Do self-pubbed authors need more ways to spend money on their books? Plus, many stores are willing to shelve local self-pubbed authors, and even to host events for them, on a straightforward consignment basis.
"Corporate America has declared war on the labor movement all across the United States."
topped with zesty light tomato sauce and shaved Greek
Now, he had leaped into a whole new stream, and with an enthusiasm that contrasted markedly with his peers. While Cushing and Lee stressed their off-screen normality, the latter in particular keen to distance himself from his horror reputation at every possible opportunity, Raven was happy to be described in newspaper profiles as a genuine occultist, wearing a black cape off-screen and on.
Singapore based journalist Sheela Narayan talks vividly about a story….
***post-edit: sold!***
It happened.
Short answer is that Vera is the main character of this book, raised by a single father after her mother ran off and whose best friend Charlie recently died after getting caught up with a bad crowd. All Vera wants is to get through the rest of her schooling before leaving for college but first she will have to confront what happened the night Charlie died.
Some people may have never heard of Gall or Baird. But Google them, you might be surprised to learn Gall is fifth all-time in total wins, and Baird is No. 1 in total wins as a trainer, some 3,000 ahead of the runnerup. Both plied their trade on small tracks, but success is success no matter what size the pond.
I mean, it's not so bad an outfit. I'm pretty excited for next week- but you'll just have to stay tuned to figure out what that will be.
Peter Gabriel wrote a song to his dad called Father-Son. Gabriel sings, "I first found my courage knowing daddy could save." While not about his music specifically, Gabriel acknowledge his father for his strength. That strength certainly led to a long successful musical career.
MTO says that the news won’t be “confirmed” until after the upcoming Real Housewives of Atlanta Reunion airs.
pressure in life..
1-2 egg yolks (for the wash; alternatively, some yogurt, egg whites, or a whole egg)
Unless you’ve been living under a rock, you’ve probably heard of the upcoming patent infringement battle looming between Yahoo! and Facebook, on the eve of Facebook’s IPO. It seems everyone has something to say on the topic (seemingly with the ironic exception of Yahoo!’s Facebook page).
On my walk with Sally this morning I thought I’d stop and have a cool drink but then decided that actually, this is probably someone’s home!
That is not to say I don't make my best best effort to pass every day but April is now who I am and that is how I live my life every day.
Full Sail
There isn’t a lot you can say…everyone knows the story of titanic…and it was nice to have went around the maritime museum in Liverpool last weekend to see the titanic model ship and read about it.
Fun fact:
Eureka! Here was proof from ages gone by that open air would work! I quickly and eagerly set about designing my new coop according to the specs and sciences provided in the pages of the book. The coops recommended for my area were not built like Diane’s, but the premise was the same, leaving a portion of the front unboarded and open with only a mesh screen to keep predators out and the birds contained. I was faced with a lot of naysayers in the area who said it would never work, but I was inspired nonetheless. All I had to do was wait out the winter until the snow melted so I could salvage my list of materials from the dump in the Spring.
But then again I remember where I took the shot!
I can’t really think of a novel of his that I haven’t enjoyed.
One day,Ruby,Anya(who is a fairy),Brennan( who it’s also a fairy and he is Anya’s little brother) and Jeremy are on the beach. Nick Martino ,Ruby’s crush,asks her out,finally.Ruby can’t speak,but Anya accepts and in this way,Ruby will hang out with Nick.
Many industry observers feel that Amazon will damage its reputation, not to say its business (since people will simply go elsewhere to buy), if it pulls another buy button shutoff move. Stay tuned.
Last night? Ahem.
Next time, I'll just directly hand the paper to the professor the moment I see her. I don't care if she's not collecting it yet. I'll just give it to her and run, end of story.
- Mom was diagnosed with Stage 2 breast cancer, BUT +, she didn't have to suffer through chemo...
The spaces might be small... but they are cosy and comfy... never crowded... and as for the location... totally wonderful... Open the door, step out on to the pavement and the pulse of Paris awaits... I wish I could show you my cute bedroom... it's tiny, but oh so comfortable... so comfortable that I have made myself right at home and created my very own un-photographable (is that a real word??) mess...
This is true of any trip or vacation I have ever taken with my family as a child
before i get to my card you are gonna be wondering why on the dt challenge blog there are no flowers on my card? duh! i forgot to add the flowers so went back and added them later and retook the photo's.
In the morning, simply remove the bowl from the fridge and add your toppings. My toppings are usually fruit and nut butter, but yours can be whatever you want! Crunchy cereal, nuts, granola, the possibilities are unlimited.
PLOT: A planet killing spaceship wants to eat the Enterprise.
I’m pretty harsh on idol shows, because my favorite show is too, an idol show: Super Dimension Fortress Macross, Macross 7, Macross Frontier, Macross Plus, Macross: Do You Remember Love? These shows give interesting idol contexts, phenomenal music (relative to pop idol fare), and are love triangles set against the backdrop of great battles. I remember some fanboys trying to convince me about the awesomeness of Idolm@ster characters. Better luck selling refrigerators to walruses.
We danced and sang together. It was so much fun! When I look out into the arean at our fans, I saw a yoosu sign. As a habit I wanted to call Yoochun to come over and look at it but when I turned to Yoochun’s direction, my movement was stopped.
Aryc entered. He extended his hand. “I’m Arsenic.”
I look forward to many days of blogging with you.
Most who know me would understand I could not leave it at this.
“for the beautiful pair of candlesticks.”
So if you don’t know for sure what is the weak link start a sales growth program that will under a year or 2 years will address and develop and enhance all these points. You will be surprised what a difference it will have for your sales force when they are involved and together with you will actually make all parts better and the end product more attractive on a competitive market.
We are learning about the schwa sound this week. Besides it being fun to say "schwa," this is the most common sound in the English language. I had no idea about that until I was searching for songs to teach the sound. Well, despite it being common, there is nothing really to help teach the sound. Today, when I was teaching reading groups, a song just came to me and I hurried and scribbled it down on a notepad. The note was dark pink and I only had an orange pen so it was incredibly hard to read when I tried later on during the day. The song is a freebie in my TPT store so feel free to grab a copy. I would love to hear how you teach the schwa sound in your classroom and what you think of the song.
When Frank D’Arbo’s (Wilson) wife Sarah (Tyler) leaves him for the local dirtbag-drug dealer Jacques, or Jock, (Bacon) he adopts the persona of The Crimson Bolt (a superhero who fights crime by beating criminals with a wrench). This idea comes to D’Arbo after he has a vision from God that includes tentacles coming from his bedroom walls and a TV super-hero known as The Holy Avenger (Nathan Fillion) who fights the Devil with the power of Jesus. The Crimson Bolt soon adds a sidekick Boltie, D’Arbo’s comic book obsessed hyperactive friend Libby (Page), and is off to save Sarah from Jacques’ evil clutches.
Question: I am a manicurist in New York. Where do I live?
I finally bite the bullet and cut Sterling's hair. He got called a "she" one too many times last week. As sad I was to cut the curls he looks so handsome and like such a little boy with his new haircut, I am loving it. He actually loved getting his haircut and laughed the whole time!
Among my sisters, there is one who was a fervent fan of the Shinhwa seniors and who even owned nude pictures of them. Because my sisters were already really interested in singers, they were really supportive of my choice to become one.
For a change I am going to focus only on singer-songwriters and there have been some very strong new albums of late…
Finally, one more apology. I'm sorry for the length of this piece. Normally I'd split something like this across more than one post but in this case, I feel it needs to be kept together.
(remember to click on the photos to enlarge them so they'll show up better)
The story opens in an auction house as the narrator attempts to purchase a violin. We are then taken back in time as the narrator recounts a chance meeting he had with a violinist of "Sold his soul to the devil" skills; a man who once owned the violin the narrator is attempting to buy. The story then spirals into another story, as the virtuoso relates a dark tale of madness and betrayal. Each layer is somehow connected to the violin, but the mysteries and identities of the players wrap the reader in knots of deception. This book is psychological and Gothic horror at its finest. It is also beautifully written.
I believe that as a ministry of the church, Ministry to Men ought to be about the Great Commission: Making Disciples for Jesus Christ.
Atlantic Yards Watch has published a report showing that the sidewalks in the vicinity of Atlantic Yards have significantly less capacity for pedestrians than the project's environmental analysis anticipates.
The modern man ingests in his lifetime an incredible amount of chemicals, artificial flavors and additives. Although there is growing awareness regarding healthy eating, there is also a lot of misinformation and disinformation.
We had a nasty run in with Gypsies “We’re from Surrey Highways, we have a bit of tarmac left over and we noticed you have a few holes in the drive. Would you like us to fill them in for you.” “Oh that’s very kind of you, yes just the big holes”. 2 hours later we go back to find they’ve tarmacked the whole drive and want paying more than a few thousand for it! After a meeting between “the lads” and the owner (who was pretty fearsome herself), they came to an agreement. A few nights later, we’re just about to get into bed and Gary hears some bangs outside. He gets dressed to see what’s going on (despite my pleas not to). Good thing he did because he discovers our car's on fire and he calls the fire brigade. The police arrive and we tell them we’ve had some trouble with Gypsies. Hmmm strange, there’s been a few mysterious cars fires in the area, but of course that’s as
Captains and Commanders are both to wear two epaulettes, of the same pattern as at present, with only the following distinctions :
At 8:30 pm we got ready to leave our house and go to the Sixth Class House in the Junior’s school.
What does marriage mean to you? Why do you want to be a married person?
See? Simple and easy, and items that parents can help out with that won't make them or their kids want to tear their hair out :)
People get so offended to see fat women with confidence. Fat women in dresses and bathing suits and any sort of clothing that draws attention…colorful, short, tight, revealing and swim wear ANY type of clothing whose purpose isnt to hide their bodies from the rest of the world. Why? Why are people so offended to see fat people being humans in public? Holding hands with their loved ones, kissing their loved ones, dancing at a club with their girls etc. Lying on a beach or sitting on a bench…. I’ll tell you why. America has its own little value system when it comes to women. Fat girls are on the bottom.
Unwrap one pie crust and spread it out in the bottom of baking dish. Bake in 350 degree oven until it's golden brown. While the pie crust is baking, I peel and chop up vegetables. Put chicken stock in stock pot and heat up over medium-high heat. Once the stock is boiling, add vegetables to the pot and cook until they are tender. Mix 2 tablespoons of corn starch with 3 tablespoons of water in a separate bowl. Add the corn starch mixture to the chicken broth and cook over medium heat until the broth has thickened (about 5 minutes). Add one container of chicken to the stock pot. Let cook a few minutes then pour mixture into the crust and top with the other pie crust. Bake in 350 degree oven for about 10 minutes, or until the crust is golden brown.
“I’ve been homeless for a while,” Kanaska says, “on and off for two or three years. It’s a choice. I find it humbles you. I used to have my own apartment and I slowly lost my mind. I was in there with my two cats and I was just like going crazy.
1 cup buttermilk or sour milk (see tip below)
Next up I have a five-page fantasy comic that needs to be drawn and a TV script to polish for the second round of the prestigious (so they tell me) Red Planet Prize. No rest for the wicked. Or freelancers.
we got to witness some live river dancing at the meet and greet. (whoa! wild stuff, i tell ya).
I reminded them that Learn Nothing Day was coming, and that we needed to practice, so shhh!!
Yesterday, I found a new blog owned by the wonderful & talented Lesley called Freshly Made Sketches. I have been looking for a few new challenges to participate in and most people know that I love sketch challenges! I decided to give it a try! Below is the sketch for this week and my sample.....
Yes yes, here I am again, the snobbery apologist. I've been back to the US for a few weeks, and I've DJed at a few milongas, and I have to say, I am absolutely appalled. I'm not an experienced DJ, but I have never felt my work be so unappreciated. A few experienced dancers and organizers come up to me at the end complimenting me on the music. Of course I have no way of knowing whether they mean it or it's just courtesy, but I'll take it at face value. The not-so-good dancers (yes, I'm being my judgmental self, so what), though, grew restless and continuously came up to me asking me for salsa and nuevo....... Seriously? Asking me for nuevo is asking for a backhanded slap to the face. Please don't make me resort to violence. And salsa? This is a city with a huge hispanic population; you can go pretty much anywhere else to dance salsa. Try asking for tango at a salsa bar...
U.S./NATO Out of Afghanistan, the Middle East and Africa!
- mickey newbury / bill callahan - heaven help the child - saint cecilia knows/drag city - 2012
08 You Got It In Ya (cuts)
In June I will be doing the relay for life with friends and family I look forward to it... I walk in Honor of my niece and in Memory of my mother in-law and grand mother in-law...
THE MADNESS OF LOVE,
With mixer still running, add 1 cup liquid. Increase speed to medium-high and beat until light and fluffy, about 45 seconds. With mixer still running, add remaining 1 cup liquid in steady stream (this should take about 15 seconds). Stop mixer and scrape down bowl with rubber spatula, then beat at medium-high speed to combine, about 15 seconds. (Batter will be thick.).
The Obama records which have not been released include; Passport records, Obama kindergarten records, Punahou School records, Occidental College records, Columbia University records, Columbia thesis, Harvard Law School records, Harvard Law Review articles, University of Chicago scholarly articles, Illinois State Bar Association records, Illinois State Senate records/schedules (said to be lost), Medical records, Obama/Dunham marriage license, Obama/Dunham divorce documents, Soetoro/Dunham marriage license, Adoption records and of course the long-form Certificate of Live Birth.
He’s only saying what we knew already, but Dominic Lawson is quite right to point out here what a colossal waste of taxpayers’ money the 2012 London Olympics are going to be. Not to mention the fact that, overall, they will have a negative effect on tourism.
Now, most of these are decorated with inside jokes and other geekiness (I am a software engineer, after all!). But seriously - how awesome are they??
**JAN 4th… by now Piney has offered me her Travel Miles, and I
Here's to a hell of a lot of sharing in 2012!
Craving thrills, smelling grave
Because she’s a writer, that’s why.
The tree gives me a deeper sense of what it is to collaborate. As a solo artist, I have a strong artistic vision, and it’s not always easy to shift that vision to accommodate the visions of others.
In the meantime, I need to stay away from the fabric store!
No 190 (61.29%) (w)
Absolutely I can remember places where I had as a kid for I had French fries and onion rings a stand in Sarasota Florida called Smacks. I can remember wonderful meals from all over the country. We have a good meal is always has to do with the enjoyment of alcoholic beverages, beer, wine whatever. Alcohol is part of the experience of a good meal.
Assemble the tart:
Imogen, looking in the mirror: Oh Mummy, I have wonderful news! I look just like a yak!
Right off they set to auditioning folk.
On the nose – Intensely sharp treacle, liquorice, with a screeching high note of sweetness.
Video or still photos?
What did matter was the poem fragments she also dropped into the last half of the book:
And they’re apparently not afraid to flaunt the bling they can buy with those riches.
A few weeks after the wedding, I graduated and found myself “in between.” I don’t do in between well. Job hunting and city hunting, I felt I had no clarity on next steps. Eventually it all took a toll on me and left me feeling kind of blah. Finally, I made some decisions, and in true form, the universe responded in kind. Within a few days I had a job offer, a clear path, and a new city to try out.
I thought it might be fun to look back to see what we were doing on (or around) this date for the last couple years. On February 26, 2010 I was rejoicing in the surprisingly, and much needed, long nap that our 2.5 month old Ruby was taking. I remember taking these pictures. And now Ruby will know that she was punk for us at home when it came to napping.
Sometimes I wonder if I was really ever in love, because as soon as the sex diminished I went off the man pretty damn quick.
He tells her she is special
After booting the Archos up after three years I found a load crap that must've been from my old (and now defunct) desktop computer. One of which was this track below. Mostly bollocks, but there's a line or two in there that mildly tickles me.
And to find someone to take me in for Thanksgiving – are you keen? Only apply if you live close to amazing malls because those black Friday sales are mine this year (I am not limiting it to location because there are three definite locations known right now – I land in NYC, need to get to Las Vegas for another tattoo and will be flying out of LAX so there’s a whole country to play with in there).
Little is known of this DJ and producer, except that he came from seemingly out of nowhere to break out of the number of young musicians making electronic music. Dillon Francis has caught the attention of worldwide acts such as Steve Aoki, will.i.am, and Diplo. He is currently signed to Diplo’s aforementioned record label, Mad Decent.
One need hardly be a constitutional scholar to understand that a federal government that can require you to purchase something you do not want or do not need can require you to do anything it wants. A government that powerful is a government to be feared.
It's funny that I enjoy these selfies so much as I do not like having my picture taken and will find all kinds of excuses why I cannot be in the picture or relinquish my camera so others can take my picture.
If he said yes it was referred as "one for the road."
So with just two and a half weeks of school left, I figured, what the heck, let’s try something new that I’ll probably be doing more consistently next year anyway. Instead of having our afternoon recess at the end of the day as an incentive, we are going to have our afternoon recess after math and before fine arts as a break. At the end of the day, students will pack up and then have the last fifteen minutes or so of the day to work independently on silent reading, writing, or have extra help on math or other academic areas.
Do you ever find yourself standing in the middle of a room wondering why on earth you came in here in the first place?
This book has me yearning to hike the Pacific Crest Trail like I never have. It has me aching to start my memoir and wishing I could write with Strayed's raw intensity. Pam Houston calls her a 'deceptively elegant' writer and that's about as close as I can come to a perfect description. Like all good writers, she makes it look easy, which it is not.
There is this little "house" set up to look like an old front porch. I am pretty sure it is for display only and not meant to be an attraction to be walked on... but before I grabbed my little trespassers off the porch, I took a great picture...
get through this minute,
As we prepare students for their futures, it's important to teach writing within the framework of technology. Research shows that projected workplace needs for our students include using electronic discourse to solve problems, work collaboratively, and communicate effectively.
Activists say they are protesting against corporate greed and the plight of ordinary people in an anemic economy and housing market.
This one pours a medium amber, but has a great light tan head. Man, the head throws off a great crisp pilsner smell. And I mean, huge. It's crisp and not very sweet, so it must be more of a Czech than a German.
I only give you all the Best of the Best! :)
So this week, after two birthday celebrations.
6. Tapirs. They are a real thing, and Friday was World Tapir Day! My colleagues and I decided to celebrate with cheese, crackers, chocolate and champers. Okay, so we actually just needed an excuse for a celebration, but once we found out about the Tapir, we were hooked. Isn’t he cute?!
Brooks also told the inquiry that Cameron sent her a ‘keep your head up’ message when she quit News International in July 2011 after the phone-hacking scandal led to the News of the World’s closure.
2011 Films Topping My Must-See List:
The gay activists who accepted the invitation praised the concert, as well as the sentiment behind the invitation, in an interview with local TV station ABC4:
Raye has two stars on the Hollywood Walk of Fame, for motion pictures, located at 6251 Hollywood Blvd., and for television, located at 6547 Hollywood Blvd.
Looking back at when WILD WILD WEST was released, I think part of the intensity of the negative reaction was that in 1999 it didn’t seem like Smith could do anything wrong, but then he releases a bad movie and a bad theme song, and it all felt a little too calculated. In hindsight, WILD WILD WEST is not a good film (and it’s especially not a good western as it feels about as “western” as Star Trek‘s alien planets feel alien – like it was all done on a sound stage), but it’s not the worst movie ever made, nor the worst movie any of the main actors associated with the film ever made. It’s just a bad film, and a misstep in Smith’s career. Obviously, the guy’s done okay for himself since then so he probably learned some lesson from making a bad movie, but I wish the lesson learned had got him to actually accept roles like Quentin Tarantino’s Django Unchained and stop taking roles like Hitch.
“We give the toys to our youngest patients as a way to help comfort them in a crisis,” says Courtney Morehouse, PIO for Rural/Metro-Pridemark. Many times, children are frightened when they need to be transported by ambulance. The bears help ease their fears and help the EMTs and paramedics provide necessary medical care during an emergency.
So how does this come together with the opening montage? Well basically Florinda Bolkan’s Macaria character is insane the whole time. Yes, she performs her voodoo-like ritual with the three dolls in the images of the three taunting kids – I told you they where trouble, and they disturbed the grave of her child, hence forcing her to move the dead baby from it’s resting place and have her perform her mumbo jumbo voodoo vengeance. But that’s merely a red herring to toss you off track, just as the trail of village idiot Giuseppe
Yep, that's one way to sway people to your side, destroy stuff. What a bunch of fucking morons. Do these dumbasses really think they are accomplishing something? Do they think anyone will take them seriously?
Work in timed chunks. This is similar to the above, but with breaks at set times, rather than on the completion of goals. For example, you could work for 20 minutes, then take 10 minutes off.
” I think you’re one of the best singer I heard in many years.”
Anyway, the amazing Annette at A Simple Breath is hosting a year long sew-along for the Embroidery Companion. "Just the thing," I thought! A group of crafters, all working on the same project each month, providing me with some motivation and accountability! So, I am currently working on the first project--Tea Towels! Fun! I am enjoying it very much, but I am having to do it in such teeny-short bursts I fear I am going to have 12 more UFO's at the end of 2011. Some things to work on in 2012 I guess!
I have used another stamp I got last week at the car booty so have no idea of the maker ..sorry
Where workthatwardrobe goes today, Hollywood stars follow tomorrow.
You may already have an amazing First Aid kit, but when was the last time you updated its contents? When I travel with my family, I always carry a backpack filled with essentials. The very day I think I will not be needing it, is the day a chaotic medical situation occurs. Don’t forget about your seasonal allergy medicines, insect repellant & sun supplies!
Luckily, Venus in Capricorn comes out of its square to Uranus in Aries and catches the tail-end of the grand earth trine formed in the zodiac by Jupiter Rx in Taurus, Mars in Virgo, and Pluto in Capricorn. Venus in Capricorn trines Mars in Virgo exactly December 5. We're assisted to get things done on all fronts, especially in and through relationship.
There is no denying it is one of the most interesting concepts for a short film round.
I've come home with a burnt nose and two carrier bags of charity shop clothes. I wanted a new dress, and have come home with three dresses (one for work, two for play), a red and white swirly skirt, a vest top, a comfy jumper, a gorgeous leather handbag, and a beautiful silk top from Monsoon, all for the less than £40. It was fun trawling the shops and finding amazing bargains. I probably would have spent more than that on one dress if I'd bought brand new, and now I have a new wardrobe... (Vanessa really is the charity shop queen).
Dr. David Barton – on Obama
“Look Idiot!!! Look at that bite!!! Something in here bit me!!!”
If I was lucky I was able to get everything out on the clothes line by 11:30 and it was already later than I usually started making lunch. It usually took an hour to prepare a meal if the oil stove was used so laundry days required simple things that didn't need to be cooked long. I would pile the dirty breakfast dishes into the sink and have a half decent meal on the table by the time LV came in from the fields.
This story took about three days to come together. For the first two days, the idol was named Chris Tje but I thought it would be way too easy for folks to get Christ Jesus out of that too soon in the story so I changed the spelling to Krys Tje. That camouflaged it a bit and later allowed me to use just Krys like other one name idols. Obviously, the references to fan club are indirect references to the pseudo-church. The ORB was used just because it is a synonym for earth or world, I can’t remember which. Just reflects that the focus of the pseudo-church is typically worldly and that all life revolves around it rather than the one they proclaim. The message delivered is more about ‘do’ than ‘done.’
Ephesians 4:25-32
Now for the tedious part - math. Blah! I placed some freezer paper on top so I could still see the pattern, but draw directly on the board (can you tell I'm obsessed with this stuff? I use it for everything!)
A week ago I heard that a friend of mine from college has a sister who is in her 30s and fighting stage 4 cancer. (This is the 3rd acquaintance of mine to be diagnosed with cancer this year. I also lost my grandmother to cancer this year.) The next morning I woke up and had another health email in my inbox. This time the topic was preventing cancer.
I'm still busy as ever, and I do hope some day I will have more time to post some of the crafts I've been working on.
i’m jumping into so much all at once right now and trying not to overthink for once. we’ll see where all this takes me.
Exclusivity
Bent Over Rowing - 4 Sets of 12 reps with 30kg
1. Cook Pasta
still yawning by the percolator.
God, do they taste good too. Really spicy when you first taste them, but as you continue to eat them you get all the savory goodness of the marinade. They are (aha!) meatlike.
That's pretty good for the week. My body is aching all over. When I checked the scale, I had lost two pounds. The only problem is that I am so tired physically that I haven't been able to keep up with the housework. Hubby and kids have been dealing with this problem okay. Luckily, my fingers can still type or you would not be getting this update. I am hoping that after a couple of weeks my body will get use to the physical exertion and I will be healthier and happier and actually be able to do more...not less.
I've decided to keep a semi regular idea post about this topic.
…is this? This, my friend, is four different 4×6 feet gaming tables. Each of those 12 boards is roughly 2×2 feet (60cm), 5.5mm thick MDF. Cheap as hell, made from just one big board (less than 2% waste, which was also cut to my requirements and brought home), and ready to receive some texture.
And a teen’s broken heart,
"I am going to attempt to provide some insight into street encounters. Other may have different viewpoints. I am not here to argue. I will say some of the comments I have seen posted in the threads about this sort of matter make me realize that while some ARFCOMMERS are clearly street veterans others are not. This is really for those who are not.
Overall Credibility: 4 (The film meshes the Freddy mythos with the Jason mythos, and since Jason has been undead and in Hell, this is not a problem really)
Though this was a little light overall I thought that this was another good episode, things are steadily becoming a lot more clearer than they were when the show began, and the Okinawan/Ryukyuan independence plot still has some potential. If anything however I’m wondering just what Pied Piper’s role in this will be.
Please note though...this method is not useful if you want lots of pulp. It keeps that contained, so I would never get the orange squeezer. I don't know if I'm supposed to place the lemon half convex or concave, but my way forces the juices down into the drain holes, and juice doesn't "bubble up" the top of the squeezer.
- Sean says he was meeting former colleagues at the disused tyre factory in Cavan for social reasons and not to conceive a new business. Judge concludes the premises was kitted out “not purely for social reasons”
I now wish the entire front was filled with these lovelies, but alas they are slow starting for me.
From then on, Milo was a champ. Thanks to the sedative, he was pretty placid the entire flight and even the taxi ride from Charles de Gaulle to the hotel. Permanently scarred, for sure, but doing okay.
I dyed some rice blue, and Punkin sprinkled it on a page of glue (to make rain). Then, she glued cotton balls at the top (as clouds) to make her own rainy day picture. This idea came from A Little Delightful.
Ursula - Alabaster Size 6
To counter this Gillian Tett has identified the ‘urgent need for a large cadre of ‘cultural translators’’, who can explain what is happening in the silos to everyone else. ‘We need people who can join up the dots and present the big picture.’ The UK Speechwriters’ Guild is such a cadre.
Wonderful colour, sort of a bright copper, the citrus and passion fruit aroma. Great freshness again with this bottle like the last, the bitterness creeps back in your mouth and hits the back nicely, fades a little early but by then your going for another sip so it's a moot point. Crisp sharp orange that should be left in the fruit bowl a little longer, and a wonderful hop dryness.
moves ever closer to its end.
Designer -Jeanne Streiff
As the winds increased my efforts to keep warm were dwindling and yet I became a bit more competitive in my search to spot a whale. I was even pleased to discover a few dolphins between the waves, white caps and sun. Then I plopped down on the top step of the Clicker Beach walkover and put on another layer and started rubbing my hands together to try and get the circulation going.
And that leads me to the topic of today. I have heard it said that certain jobs require you to have a bit of an ego. Fighter pilot, head chef, race car driver and to some extent the tech support guy. But being an supervillain requires more ego than any of the rest of them. That is why you so seldom hear of them teaming up, and why when they do team up it rarely works out.
If you love the images the DT girls have used and find yourself saying that you must have it! Click on the image title right under the DT's name to be taken directly to the image in the shop.
There is a huge chunk of the educational bureaucracy wedded to these multicultural ideals. They’re convinced that America is bad. They’re certain that encouraging foreign children to speak English and join the mainstream culture is a racist act, and they’re determined to prevent it.
Thanks for reading!
Like the idiot that I was, I kept putting off on listening to them. A day before the event, I finally relented and started viewing live clips of the band on YouTube and discovered that I like the band – a lot. However, just when I was getting ready to buy tickets, it sold out. Hopefully, you were able to catch them before they inevitably start playing bigger venues.
I love youse guys and the Irish tea.
You can design your own gown, something you can truly call your own or you can also ask for the help of a designer and just tell her the exact details that you want for your gown and how exactly do you want to look on that special day. You can also search online for beautiful beach wedding gowns and for sure you’ll have a wide array of selections where you can get ideas for your own perfect gown. They can also give you helpful tips in choosing for the best gown that will perfectly suit you. There are numbers of gowns and designs online and for sure you’ll get one that is perfect for you.
The cost will be $65 per person, excluding tax and gratuity, and reservations are required. The Craft Beer at Chifa Dinner Series will continue this winter with the brothers from Troegs Brewing Co on Thursday, December 16 and Garrett Oliver from Brooklyn Brewery on Thursday, January 20.
The term “alamak” in Singlish, according to talkingcock.com (but I guarantee the definition’s pretty accurate), is as follows (i just copied and pasted the entire chunk):
Chinese herbalists advise against using white peony root when cold-deficiency diarrhea is present.
I am seriously selling everything from the loft in a bid (ha ha) to make some money and make some space in said loft.
And that’s about how incredibly difficult it is, and getting worse, to get a book – however good, however much everyone believes in it – through to its readers. A whole host of hurdles are in the way – conditioned not by the content or quality of the book, but by the economic models and sales targets of publishing and bookselling of today. It has of course always been like that, but the goalposts for any one individual book have moved. Manuscripts at acquisition are judged by whether they are likely to ‘pay for themselves ‘- achieve individual sales targets that justify publishing them, and then by whether they have – in those terms – succeeded or not. There is little room for the book predicted to have modest sales, but which simply deserves to be published because it is so good – and fighting for that kind of book can be dispiriting.
Oakeshott sees Rationalist politics as a consequence of the rise of politically inexperienced people and classes to power. He takes Machiavelli's writings as an exemplary case; Oakeshott sees his work as an advice book for the novice ruler. This really makes no sense in light of the longstanding existence of self-governing communes in Renaissance Italy; political experience had long been a fairly widely distributed good.
The biceps
+ Funkadelic - Maggot Brain - 1971
2. High quality materials
“Design in art, is a recognition of the relation between various things, various elements in the creative flux. You can’t invent a design. You recognize it, in the fourth dimension. That is, with your blood and your bones, as well as with your eyes.“
From morning sun ’til dine
Fireworks: Launch Purple Fireworks
So, with all that rambling being said, dear followers...er follower.... who is or is not reading.....you will find one of my favorite inspirations in personal style below.
When you pass the course test, you will receive the LION chip accolade which you see above.
My aunt Cindy came up yesterday and she brought with her this beautiful picture in a frame.
Okay, before I freak out too much, my vet is coming by later. I will wait and hear what they have to say. I will wait with the freaking out…. Just a few more hours.
Elsie and I had a great time of seeing what we wanted to see at a pace that wasn’t too fast, or too slow. I know there are going to be questions from Haiti people and non-Haiti people alike about the trip, so consider this my version of how to do it.
Hugs xx
-You must be a subscriber to enter (please only participate in the giveaway if you plan on sticking around if you're a new subscriber!)
I love ticker tape quilts and thought hers was a unique take on it, so I wanted to feature it here for yall. Angie even overlapped some of the pieces. The finished size is 49"x49". Click the image below to see more pictures.
Many happy hours spent watching these two. As the years progress, I begin to notice the magnificence of the characterisation. The facial expressions of Old Wiley, the ingenious invention of his.....err inventions (all from ACME) as he tries his best. Classic.
4/23/2012 ConsolidatedGraphics 59204 Leadership Development Associate – Entry-Level Sales/Management Career All, Eng/Tech/Math, Bus/Econ, Arts/Creative
In the eighth, Lucas Duda hit the game-winning RBI single to send the Citi Field fans home happy. You can read all about the game in the recap I wrote for The Daily Stache last night.
I'm that mom who always takes my children seriously as the fully-formed people they are and encourages exploration of their own life paths even when they differ from my own. I'm that mom who always views my children with eyes of amazement and wonder at the people they are and the people they are becoming.
That loss to Gibbs AAU wasn’t the worst loss of the season, though. Neither was the 125-54 drubbing in the first game against the P.I. Marines. The worst defeat would be an 87-point loss at Furman, 154-67. That game would become part of an unusual record, for in the second meeting that year between the two teams, The Citadel elected to play stall-ball (why the Bulldogs didn’t try that strategy more often during the season, I don’t know). I was once told by someone that at one point during the game most of the players on both teams were sitting down on the court, a few of them amiably chatting with one another. Furman eventually won the game, 26-24. The 85-point differential from one game to the next between the same teams is an NCAA record. Normally, a record like that would occur when a team lost by a large margin and then came back and posted a dominant victory. In this case, however, The Citadel (naturally) managed to lose both games.
Sources: wikipedia, youtube, imdb.com
“First. I will accept Jesus as my Lord and Saviour.
Criminy. Who doesn't want to be forewarned, The flora are coming! The flora are coming!?
Yesterday was an interesting albeit unusual day for me. It all started with an innocent question from the girls of whether the American slaves had a "Moses" which led me to discover that it was exactly the 44th anniversary of Martin Luther King Jr's assassination. I watched portions of vintage speeches and then got inspired to scrapbook a layout on King which I felt really needed to be wrapped up on the same day of April 4. It dawned on me that I was precisely 4 months old when he was assassinated so I rummaged through the few photos I had from childhood ( ~ I was daughter #4 so photos are few for me!) and, lo and behold, I had photos from April 1968. I found King's famous "I had a dream" and "I have been to the mountaintop" speeches in written format and photos of him in US national archives online which I printed out along with the headlines from the New York Times for April 5, 1968 announcing his death online.
I’m not saying that every gay person, every Black person, every any type of person is a good one. There are bad eggs in every group of people. I am saying that everyone needs to open their minds to the possibilities in others who are not cookie cutter images of themselves. Broaden your horizons. Stop judging others. It’s all right to say, “That isn’t something I feel comfortable with doing, but I respect the fact that you are”.
What is there to be done? Too weak and too strong, with no idea how to surrender, stuck in a self-defeating cycle of dysfunction? I am too exhausted to try any harder, and too keyed up to get any rest.
So, back to the Banana Strawberry Loaf. I followed Joy’s recipe step by step, but at the last minute, decided to throw in some chocolate chips. I mean, what else in the world could make this recipe any better than it already was? Come On.
It is remarkable that, even though the obscenity of rape and the inviolable rights of women over their bodies are among the shibboleths of the age, feminists and other liberals are almost totally silent when Muslims violate these sacred codes.
Now as if spying on your kids and tattle-telling isn’t enough, apparently this elf moves from room to room each night causing mischief. Some of the mommy blogs are listing creative ways to have the elf make mischief, all in the name of good Christmas fun – switch all the clothes from one closet to another, make cookies IN THE MIDDLE OF THE NIGHT and leave the dirty dishes for mom in the morning…
The three-vehicle convoy crested a rise to find a half-circle of vehicles blocking the road and the ditches on either side. Tanner’s wheel man attempted an evasive maneuver but more vehicles topped the two small hills on either side of the caravan. The only exit was at the convoy’s six o’clock. The larger trucks simply could not execute the tricky maneuver to escape. They were trapped unless they attempted to drive straight ahead at the two Deuce-and-a-half’s parked in a V shape.
Kisses on her cheek,
More recently, an ephedra/caffeine preparation made from kola nut extract and a Chinese medication known as Ma Huang was tested for safety and efficacy as part of a weight reduction program. The study indicated that the preparation improved the subjects’ rate of weight loss and reduction in body fat without undesirable side effects.
"I do know that when they are older, and telling their own children about their grandmother, they will be able to say that she stood in the storm, and when the wind did not blow her way - and it surely has not - she adjusted her sails."
Simply put, an addict cannot grow in their recovery until they embrace truth completely — no denial.
110) I'd like to take stock at the end of each month and make sure the following things are organized: Rhys' toys, My car, My closet, My makeup/bathroom drawers. This would be in lieu of freaking out for weeks on end because our stuff is in shambles and I can't find anything.
It causes the vertical distance between the bustline and the hipline to be shorter than normal at the centre back (CB). The side seam remains of normal vertical length:
It was a song, and I didn’t necessarily know how i came to this conclusion but it worked. I suppose the surreal aspect of it managed to take my mind of the sexual enjoyment enough to mute the orgasm so to say. And I would just sing it to myself in my head for hours and hours and hours.
Members of the BAR, here are your choices: A.) Come into the Light; or
Count 'em up, and send your best guess to: sncontests@gmail.com The winning entries get a $5 gift certificate to Silk Naturals. All entries must be received by 12:01 am Eastern Standard Time August 16th 2010. Please include your full name, along with your city, and state or country so we can identify the winners.
"Couldn’t I just wear my old coat?"
And look ahead in frustration.
I was out on my Mukluk several times this week in temps that ran the gamut from unseasonably warm 50s to more normal single digit temps that had my toes crying uncle after two hours even with my Lake winter cycling boots protecting them. I'm curious to see how my road bikes feel once I hit the streets this spring after having spent most of the winter on what amounts to a tank in comparison.
A sympathy card for my stash. Hopefully I won't need to use it anytime soon.
....In my last post, I discussed the neglect of communist atrocities. Although communist governments murdered and repressed even more people than the Nazis, their crimes have gotten only a tiny fraction of the public awareness and recognition extend to the latter. But does that neglect matter? After all, the major communist regimes have either collapsed (the USSR and its Eastern European satellites) or evolved into much less oppressive forms (China and Vietnam). But there are several reasons why increasing recognition of communist crimes should be an important priority: providing justice for victims and perpetrators; alleviating the oppression of the unreformed communist governments that still exist today; and ensuring that comparable atrocities are never repeated....
That must reach out
supper t-rex titillated over the pattern…. Can you even
It's Carnival Time again! Mardi Gras actually started on Twelfth Night, January 6th, and runs full steam until Midnight on Fat Tuesday, this year February 24th.
over Tuesday and helped me put it together.
But I'm not sure why I feel the need to torture myself -
*”Y’all drink a lot.”
about the eu and all the regulations that make life hard,
This week, I decided not to do my usual, which is "No, thank you, go away", but to listen, then tell them why the answer is still "No".
The tent has been checked to make sure it's still all there, the pump for the inflatable mattress has been bought, a warm jumper for the evening has been looked out and the sun cream (I'm an optimist) has been purchased.
Little Johnny, who had just opened his book, closed it slowly, and said to the stranger, "What would you like to discuss?"
I already had a Dollar Store basket that was $1.00...so, I decided it would be a perfect way to package the gift. No taping, or gift wrap needed...YAY!
Links worth browsing... These are great lists of places to stay... but make sure to visit each of their unique websites to really get a feel for the properties...
Moderator: TBA
Important to note about this mysterious battle in Antarctica was its being ordered by one of America’s most powerful war leaders, US Secretary of the Navy James Forrestal, but who was “suicided” after the crushing defeat of the Operation High-Jump forces.
Sheriff Fatman
I took my first step last weekend. I switched out a green candle with a teal vase up on our kitchen shelving display! And I luuuurve it!
The book continues to indicate that the top or closure head couldn't be roll bonded, so that the stainless steel was applied by weld deposition (machine welding.)
Neptune Equester
Heard Him pray, “Forgive them, Father,”
MTV FRED KELLY SitcoM ProjecT: 30 Minutes Against Rock’n Roll By The One Who CreateD Punk Rock in 77 With The New Wave Against The PunK!!
What would Mae West say?
I have a winner for my Blog Candy!!!!
And there were the trusty old standby’s, clumps of coneflowers and black eyed susans, standing tall, with only seed pods left upon their thick stems. Fuzzy lamb’s ears had been diminished, shrunken down tight upon the soil in wilted, wet, grayish green layers of leaves, all former fuzziness disappeared. They appeared stuck in a wet embrace with the ground, suctioned tight by the forces of gravity, moisture and once heavy snow atop.
We went from YAP to Charlie's baseball game where we saw Charlie have an awesome game! His hitting and fielding have really improved this year. It is so exciting watching him because he clearly enjoys playing.
Me and Bobbie McGee
Most successful bloggers are making 6-8 figures with blogging. If you want to make that kind of success, you must read this post about 6 Easy Ways To Blog Better.
Dreamers ~ by Knut Hamsun (Norway)
14. List two advantages and two disadvantages each to taking notes by hand in a notebook AND to using a recorder for interviews. Bonus: List one advantage and disadvantage to using a laptop.
In the entire movie, this is the only scene that honestly works me up in the way that a horror film ought to - traumatic medical scenes, particularly those involving long needles, have a better than average chance at getting me where I live - so I knew pretty much straight away that it's where I'd start looking; I was surprised and pleased to find a shot that nailed so perfectly what might be my favorite single subtextual thread of the whole movie. For context: Regan is presently strapped to an examination table, and she is being plugged into all sorts of machines, and then we see a big ol' needle full of an injection, which is then pulled out of the shot to show Regan's terrified mother, Chris (Ellen Burstyn) looking on.
2. On each side of the bookcase, I would like to install these reading/wall lamps, since we enjoy reading in bed at night, and we will be moving the lamp that is currently bedside.
Civilians usually don't have the high degrees of privacy or secrecy in their projects as do the government and military sectors. HAARP comes to mind as does the war robot.
Inside the house isn't nearly as lovely as outside; its all clutter & cleaning projects that make me wince ... like my carpet needs a serious cleaning. Ah, the joy of owning three large dogs & living out in the country without the blessing that would be hard wood floors. There is too much to do to prepare for the holiday & I haven't got enough hands to juggle it all.
Food Insecurity
Finders keepers…
Another very different style of card for me but I'm enjoying trying new things.
UP ALL NIGHT could go either way. It generally beats whatever’s on TELEMUNDO so for NBC that’s a big plus.
That being said, the fact that people were actually working on a Saturday probably means that they hope to welcome diners soon.
I don't really have a favorite place. Sometimes my bed, on a cold day or the lawn chairs that over look Moonstone Beach in Cambria, CA at the Cambria Shores Inn. They serve goodies throughout the day for their guests and you can watch the Pacific Ocean with a cup of tea and a warm cookie.
¾ cup raw whole wheat
-On April 30, 1961, he was indirectly involved in a rare feat. The infielder did not play that day, but teammate Willie Mays borrowed one of his bats and used it to hit four homers and drive in eight runs against the Braves!
As a coach, it can be really helpful to know about how the PFC works so you can be aware of what might make a difference for your client. In the first instance, we focused on her values and vision, which helped her find a bigger context for engagement. For the young employee, my client tried some different strategies to help her learn to cope more effectively with stress, and they eventually reached a mutual understanding that the position was not a good fit. It was a classic — and very humane — example of coaching someone out of a job, and the employee left on good terms.
I’ve read bad books with horrible characters, but I usually keep reading because I may be mildly interested in the plot. Maybe I didn’t get far enough, but the plot was boring. I didn’t care about anything.
Such a writing style caused me to spending the first 120 pages drowning clueless and contemplating if there is any way I could even finish half the book.
Old School is blocked and then Taker fluffs on a Stinger Splash and ends up on the floor where Edge takes it to him again with a spear from the apron to the railing and then waffles him with a baseball slide. Shoulderblocks and stomps in the corner from Edge but he ends up taking a wicked bump off a blind charge and Taker follows out with his ‘Mania speciality, the tope con hilo.
He remembered something that never happened. –A.M. Homes
John Lu, who had flown in from Montreal that very day, and Sylvia Kuzyk, who was a convincing vixen, were the runners-up. John wowed the audience with his natural stage ability and great parody of bad Asian films opposite scene partner Alissa Watson. Sylvia had the grace and airs down pat for a famous actress, a lovely contrast to Toni Reimer’s mousy character who has come pleading for her husband back.
Department of Correctional Services, Republic of South Africa
Overall, my experience with Mass Effect was an enjoyable one. It was a worthwhile journey. The destination, however, was not worth that journey; so much so that I remain unsure that I will make the journey a subsequent time with other characters.
Gibby, go sit in the…
14Or in your house different measures, a great and a small.
did you think about it?”
An interesting factoid: "Immigrants founded or cofounded almost half of 50 top venture-backed companies in the United States".
SweetLi: OMG! OMG! I LOVE YOU. YOU'RE SUCH AN INSPIRATION!
:: i spent many a weekend mornings on ladders painting while everyone else was sleeping ;) this is the new master bath where an old clawfoot tub that we found in our barn will be refinished and sit....i can't wait to sit in that tub and soak, one day!
I haven't even managed to get up half an hour early yet.
I'm not a big fan of the name. As I told the others, "farnc" sounds like the noise I make when I expel alcohol from my system. My objected was not noted. I suggested the name "Doug and His Peeps." For some reason that didn't go over well.
Revenge was not so sweet as I thought it would be
“The Boerevolk never oppressed anyone,” he says. “We might have benefited from apartheid, but we were never the people who governed this country and made all those mistakes. Those were the Afrikaners.
Mark Meadows (REP) 48.90% 1,240
Telling the truth is no longer a defence in law, telling the truth is now a criminal offence in law.
BLITZER: Congratulations.
back to the scene
We have been a little MIA online, with no recent blog posts or FB action.
and thank goodness for this success
31. Super Marios Brothers
Hmmm. Now that I think about it, the other most important elected position in the United States, American Idol, has also had its share of unique names. From memory (which I couldn't do with presidents, because I can never remember Rutherford B. Hayes), they are Kelly, Ruben, Fantasia, Carrie, Taylor, Jordin,
He quickly changed the subject.
After a while you find you must have been asleep, because suddenly you have woken with a stiff neck and the realization that there is still another 6 hours to sit still.
I created this card with my interpretation of the term homespun. It is for a challenge with that theme. It's very simple. The lace flower: lace from my stash that I sprayed with glimmer mist (including the thread I used to close it down) and a button from my stash. The yellow flowers I crocheted with ribbon and the centers are crochet yarn knotted a couple of times.
What do you think: Is this Biblical or not?
Optional flavors
Glen Ramadharsingh, in an attempt at self-promotion in the Parliament yesterday revealed that calls to the child hotline has tripled in the last year. Ramadharsingh, speaking on the Children’s Bill…which was passed with 37 votes (YAY!!!!), was pointing out that he has increased monies to the Child Hotline….Glen, unless the money came out of your pocket….you didn’t do it, WE, the Taxpayers, did!!!!!
You do find that you are stronger and fitter, but some of the improvement has to do with the fact that you know how to do the exercises and you know what’s coming up. Insanity is good anyway… after 6 or so weeks of it I feel great!
Actually, perhaps that shouldn’t be a surprise. Not that things aren’t looking so good, but that people just had this blind optimism for so long that it would all come right sooner or later – the government would sort it, or it would sort itself. People expected that things would be no different this time than they were for all of the previous recessionary cycles over the last 3-4 decades.
The Bright Angel Trail goes more into a crevice of the canyon and feels a bit narrower than Kaibab, which is all about impressive, wide views. Bright Angel is intimate, following a creek most of the way up. We passed deer and crossed the creek a few times, and stopped for lunch at the Indian Garden campground about 1/3 of the way up – as the name indicates, an old native farm site. My favorite part of the trail is that it has well maintained rest houses (composting toilets & shaded areas to sit and catch your breath) every 1.5 miles, so it’s easy to have clear break points to give your legs a rest before continuing the intense elevation climb – which is about 4800 feet, but with half of that climb in the last 1/4 of the trail.
From the perspective of the livestock sector, I believe that there have been two key breakthroughs in India over the last four decades, with the first being the introduction of ‘cross breeding’. Second would be ‘marketing’, initiated by the Operation Flood programme in 1970. This program ultimately enabled India’s move towards becoming the largest producer of milk in the world.
"Well son, we'll call it a Lima Bean, since it's lime green."
The powerful tool was built to fire 4-inch nails at 120 pounds per square inch (8.4 kg per square cm), said hospital spokeswoman Lori Shaffer.
Collect all 11 maps of Moria to obtain a Map of Moria for your house + The title, “Moria Cartographile + 10 Turbine Points.
2) Severing of Diplomatic Ties and Trade Links
Now facing a hostile takeover, the firm’s origins are challenged when new facts emerge about Adele’s actions on the night Titanic sank. Kelsey tries to defend the company and the great-grandmother she has long admired, but the stakes are raised when Kelsey’s boss is murdered and her own life threatened. Forced to seek help from Cole Thornton, a man Kelsey once loved—and lost, thanks to her success-at-all-costs mentality—she pursues mysteries both past and present. Aided by Cole and strengthened by the faith she’d all but forgotten in her climb up the corporate ladder, Kelsey races the clock to defend her family legacy, her livelihood, and ultimately her life.
To Make the Biscuits:
Nevertheless, Greece has more than one million immigrants, legal and illegal, in a country of 11 million people.
100g caster sugar (original recipe uses 150g)
Maybe we should take this as a lesson. The fact that we met is already a lesson. We’re on the brink of collapse all over again. Maybe some people just weren’t meant to be friends. Our personalities obviously clash, one way or another. Maybe it’s better if we stayed apart. I’d be alright with being civil, just as long as the badmouthing stops. I don’t want to do that to you, and I don’t want us to race each other, hoping to be the first one to tell our friends about our dilemma, hoping they’d be on one of our sides before the day is over. I don’t want all that unnecessary tension because it’s immature. We don’t need that.
Chart of the Week
He: It is as if people take the cab to the gym and pay shitload of money to exercise when they have this for free….
So will you be joining on my little journey? I would love to hear about your experiences. I do increasingly believe in the power of this here little blog and this community who can support each other.
"Woah!" you might exclaim, "and he married you?" Yup. He thought the poem was fantastic, and he showed it to everybody at the party. And some people were actually jealous. Nobody ran away. Pretty weird, huh? And AWESOME, too!
"Most would like to stay but they were being chased by crime, corruption, water pollution and an unfriendly government," deputy secretary Bennie Van Zyl said, adding that "no government department at this stage was not a threat to the farmer."
Yes, I hear you: that pedestrianised area I'm referring to - it's pronounced ' morl ' and not 'mahl'.
And I like it.
Cogito ergo sum is the equation that proves the fact. But first, before we go on, let’s ask what else we know. What else can be said for certain? Nothing. We don’t know anything else. And that’s the real point of the cogito. The importance of I Am isn’t that it’s a fact, but that it’s the only fact. I Am is the only thing anyone has ever known or will ever know. Everything else, all religion and philosophy and science, is nothing more than dream interpretation. There is no other fact than I Am. The cogito is the seed of the thought that destroys the universe. Beyond the cogito, nothing is known. Beyond the cogito, nothing can be known. Except I Am, no one knows anything. No man or god can claim to know more. No God or array of gods can exist or be imagined that know more than this one thing: I Am.
That could be a very difficult metric to quantify and measure because truth be told, and no disrespect intended, does anyone really go back later and check their work?
I am grateful for the time I was able to spend with my father, and for the realization that it wasn't enough, and for the changes that will help me make with my own children.
This isn't one of those books that you can recommend or not. It's something that I feel probably every single person should read, at the very least so that they an make some informed decisions about what they put in their mouths every day. It is a hard read, but Jonathan Safran Foer is an excellent writer who makes the topic engaging, thought provoking and best of all, not preachy or guilt inducing. I couldn't handle the whole truth but I don't regret that I have been exposed to it.
J.Crew -1 return from Jinan with all of Park Ha’s belongings in three boxes. At work, Tae Yong explains that he’s no longer marrying Se Na because she’s an evil, manipulative bitch. Chi San tells the rest of them that back home in Joseon, the same was rumored about the real Crown Princess.
Proving the only one in step are you.
The ride from Chico to Angels Camp in Calaveras County, California (made famous by Mark Twain) was mostly along Highway 49, with a stop in the quaint little town of Nevada City for lunch at Lefty's Grill. Well worth a visit for the brisket sandwich with jalapeno and cilantro cole slaw. We all loved that meal. Here is the one picture I took today that impressed me.
So, once Alexander the Great is added to the garden I will do another update. Are YOU planning a family garden?
Wise words.
As the other passengers scurried onto the ship from the gang plank while we took pictures on the ship’s beautifully adorned staircase, wind and rain came spraying in and thunder was our background music. Guess what . . . a cruise ship is VERY dark inside – at least this one was. So I had to revert to my least favorite photography tool – my flash! Check out Vanessa on the right with the natural wind-blown hair! They were freezing, but it worked out great photographically!
Yesterday was my good friend Michelle's Birthday! I wanted to make her something extra special this time around and I know how fond she is of Bird designs so it was an easy decision to stitch Sergei.
Yeah, if you didn’t get the picture from the booktalk above, this one’s heavy.
I am likening this kind of villain to English toffee because he has two different and equally delicious parts: the yummy villain chocolate, and the brickle toffee inside, two distinct experiences that go beautifully together.
Have you all noticed that more and more often our protagonists lead imperfect lives. As the story unfolds, these imperfect characters leading imperfect lives try to resolve the conflict by tackling their own personal imperfections first.
The first person interviewed is one Paul Hooper, a well paid ASH propagandist who is well known to Freedom2Choose,Tony Blows and his wife. Paul Hooper attended court where Tony was handed down a £17,000 legal bill for defying the smoking ban and while Tony was being sentenced Hooper gave a hangman sign to Tony's lovely wife, using his tie as a noose, while she waited for Tony's fate outside, lovely man, ain't he. Here is some info on Paul Hooper:
Joel: Like when first you are born, then you are a baby, then you are a big kid, then you are a grown up, then you are a grandpa and then you die?
Ricardo Elena, a member of the foundation’s honorary board, said that the United States, “likes to think it is the seat of democracy, but it has political prisoners just like a dictatorship might have.”
6. Place the embutido in a steamer and steam for an hour. Alternatively, place embutido in a wire rack on a baking pan, half filled with hot water. Cover with aluminum foil (Be sure the steam will not escape). Steam-bake in the center of the oven for an hour.
I suppose if there had been literature aimed at teenage girls in my youth, as there is in abundance today, I might have fallen for the sexy vampires and devoted werewolves, the broken angels and redeemable demons. But I was spared them.
here is my very last page
Why is it that some people just cannot put themselves in the feet of others? New studies have examined the emotional intelligence of the “elite”, which explain some of their weird psychological developments and missing empathy towards other human beings in general. The Founder of Public Relations, which one described as „Propaganda“ in the late 1920′s, Edward L. Bernays states,
The discovery that Sarah was a weaver who had a deep reverence for nature inspired the piece pictured above. From the tidbits of information that I found in the New York Times, she was working with grass on crash fiber. It was considered a new and interesting material choice for her. I decided, for my own piece, to focus on the word "grass" and to weave with a new material that I had not used before: copper wire. I am not certain what "crash" is, but from the definition that I found, it sounded similar to linen warp string.
A galaxy of left-hand scrawl and crossed-out words
* wear the pads
A fat pinch of turmeric.
After dinner, we came back to the house, and started watching Killers, which we got from Netflix, but the disc messed up about half an hour in. So, we notified Netflix that the disc was bad, and put on Mythbusters! We've been watching Mythbusters for about 2 hours now! Yay!
8) Mesrine I & II
Cosmic Fever
What terrible thing will happen if he chooses A; what terrible thing will happen if he doesn't.
The Rockefeller family syndicate uses Goldman Sachs and Citibank as its major financial fronts. Bank of America is a front for the Italian black nobility behind the Vatican and the mafia, run in part by Peter Hans Kolvenbach, the former black pope. Pope malevolent the 16th is also a senior member of this satanic group.
ONCE AGAIN...
I’m no longer going to be an only child.
This is for all the girls who can’t understand ‘why?
The movie was cool, then there was a little gathering at the upstairs lounge. I wasn't expecting sofas and a projection screen! And some good food (vegetarian meatballs made from eggplants... never had that) while watching Missing In Action 3 and mingling a bit.
The Texas Coalition to Abolish the Death Penalty and Trinity United Methodist Church present
I hear the whistle, that's the call
to shake the hands
The blend of action, humor and romance keeps it interesting for everyone. The overall tone is light, written in the first person and it is action packed. However not only the tone is light, but the plot as well. The relationship between the two main characters is predictable and the villains with their evil cult were dull. While there was somewhat disappointing moments, Jennifer surprised me with Jaz’s secret which is revealed near the end. Finally, I loved Bergman the equivalent to Q in James Bond, the quirky, intelligent, funny, but paranoid character. I loved his gadgets, while they didn’t prove useful.
For more info: (910) 763-7349
14. Boredom
My mind's been stuck on math most of the summer, but for good reason. I'm excited to be switching classes for 2 hours a day with another teacher to teach math and science to her class as she teaches mine reading. So I get to teach math and science twice a day. I think I'm going to love it! I've been able to focus more on math and science planning and I don't have to worry about figuring out where my literacy stations will go and I've been able to make more room for math stations. Yay!
Well, that's about it for now!! Congratulations if you've made it to the end. I'm looking forward to another exciting day tomorrow, and will hopefully write more about it tomorrow night.
Indeed, the most commercially successful novelists have branded themselves by hewing to the boundaries of various genres. Writers have made millions following the rules of creating stories that fit into preordained slots. Sometimes they have invented new slots such as “the woman in jeopardy,” a genre pioneered by Mary Higgins Clark, or “the good lawyer,” a genre practically invented by John Grisham or the “strong woman family dynasty,” genre stumbled upon by Barbara Bradford Taylor. Or the wildly successful Christian based series Left Behind. Cheers and congratulations to them. They have found the secret of a successful and sustained novel writing career.
In fact, Najib’s flip-flop in the way he handled Bersih 3.0 is a clear indication of his incapability as a leader.
Strain the alcohol from the dry ingredients through a cheesecloth. Gather the ends of the cheesecloth to form a pouch and squeese tightly to extract as much alcohol as possible. Place the dry ingredients in a strong bowl or mortar; reserve the alcohol in a clean mason jar and seal tightly.
When I was a young newlywed, my mother-in-law often told me “you don’t know who you are.” She usually reserved the remark for those times when I’d been a bit of a pill … and that seemed to happen a lot.
Asha said the suspects were
3. Here's a 3-D Home Printer for $500. All you need to do is add a computer and you’ll be off printing almost any object that comes to mind.
The first six apps to be launched today are:
The proposal on capital may not sound much of a reform but it is designed to attack and subvert the legitimacy of capital and capitalist thinking. To fully implement it would destroy the concepts lying behind capital’s power over us.
So I want to challenge you to do two things:
Mouleff is accused of raising cash for the purposes of terrorism and charged with conspiring with others to defraud banks of large sums of money.
The first layer on the main timeline in Flash is locked.
Tomorrow I go to visit my surgeon for my post-op appointment and I am SOOOOO glad that I will finally get to remove the damn dressing and this massive brace, for hopefully a more streamlined brace. Also to get rid of the TED stocking will be great too.
"We wanted to fill them with change and shake them," said Smorgen, "but change has started to become scarce again and we don't know if we have enough. So we will fill them with dried pasta instead. We will also bang on them with wooden spoons."
Chinese Artist Huang Guofu Paints With Mouth And Feet
A prisoner sentenced to thirty years because of his part in a terrorist plot to use his position with British Airways to help him blow up an airliner in flight has complained that he is not being allowed to use the Skype system to make overseas calls from prison. The sad thing is that the authorities are listening to him and his complaint has been referred to some official body. He should have been laughed at and his complaint filed in the dustbin where it belonged.
#289 Tony Torcato (Giants) / #290 Chris Snelling (Mariners)
Whether or not this began innocently, she has allegedly stolen money from over 100 people (and those are just the ones coming forward). A David Mamet character once said something to the tune of, "I'm a confidence man, not because you put your confidence in me, but I put my confidence in you." This blogger put her confidence in thousands of people. And whether or not money changed hands (or however you'd put it in PayPal terms), we were all duped.
Therefore, as you are impressing your boss with being more productive, you get to prepare and train yourself for future leadership roles at the same time while being on stand-by for it. Isn’t that great?
This is not an argument for trusting or mistrusting any particular Muslim. It is simply important to be aware of these facts, to realize that there is a religious ideology whose adherents may be held to a standard that allows (or even requires) them to be misleading or untruthful.
1 envelope Italian dressing mix
This is a partial list of things we have been interested in or doing for the last 9 months.
I am adjusting to being back at work and it really isn't that bad.
Mount Taranaki, close to the farm.
"privileges": men can be hyper-emotional and vulnerable, women can
Beers may change for better or for worse but for me it is all part of the nature of the craft beer industry.
If this find this type of Black culture is difficult to define, how do people know what to put in "Black History Month" or MOBO?
Mr. Jack Jones, the outspoken Socialist member of Parliament for Silvertown, said his last word on the subject of beer. In an article in the Social Democrat he declares that "It is time that teetotal, as well as other fanatics in the Labour movement, were put in their places. It is time that all these people who preach against beer were made to drink a pint of it. I would like to make them drink one pint—and I would pay for it— just to see if there is the least possible chance of making them human."
"At about 00:10, three armed men stormed into the house. We think they got in through the door of the garage.
ORG/CONTACT PERSON: Iligan City Government
One thing I have learned in my reading is that there are right times and wrong times to read certain types of books. If you read a perfectly good book at the wrong time, it can influence your opinion of that book. Sometimes though, we have to read the wrong book at the wrong time because we made a commitment as a reader, blogger, librarian, etc. Yet, there are the books that surprise you. You think it is the wrong book at the wrong time, and it turns out to be the perfect book for that time.
Apparently, in this scenario, Mr. Voss starts out much like the Soup Nazi in that classic Seinfeld episode. Funny how “Nazi” and “Christian” are paralleled A LOT.
05 - Tatanka 04:58
Tuesday, April 3
Sure enough they drop him off at the hospital, from where he called us and told us everything… he was given time off to recover but we gave him so much shit for it when he got back…
I really like simple cookie recipes - if a recipe is more involved it has to be worth it and these weren't. I'd rather spend the time making a real Tiramisu.
Yay, finally it was time for food! Malaysian dishes (white rice, mee siam, steamed herbal chicken, ginger beef and mixed vege) were served at one side of the room's corridor while the Western and tea-time food were served at the lakeside corridor. However, Mommy only ate from the Malaysian dishes' side because Mommy does not appreciate Western food. The downside to the organization of this eating session was that there were not enough tables for you to eat your food. So Mommy resorted to going to another neighbouring restaurant's outdoor table and chair to sit and eat. The outdoor table and chair also has lakeview.
“Um.”
Scrambled Eggs- Appealing sports stories that focus on sports outside of “The Big 4.”
2 cups dark, leafy greens Spinach would probably taste best, I only had a Spring Mix on hand and it was a little bitter before I added more of the ingredients below. Spinach would have been my first choice.
You live in a fancy apartment
Another story, leaked by the CIA to Associated Press, claimed the discovery of the Abbottabad compound as the result of an electronic intercept. In August 2010, according to the story, a voice was heard in a phone conversation with someone whose cell phone US intelligence was monitoring, and from the substance of the conversation, intelligence analysts concluded that it was Kuwaiti. That in turn led CIA operatives to the Abbottabad compound, according to the story.
Pond was 11 when his village was invaded by the Khmer Rouge and his family was forced to march toward an uncertain future. Pond thought it was exciting at first, but after walking for days, passing babies left crying in the middle of the road and ditches filling with dead bodies, he began to realize: He wouldn’t be returning home in three days as his captors had said.
Filling up the trunk,
Near and far,
1 c flour
Notice the “right” in your life as well as your past, instead of the wrong.
Ik was helemaal weg van de schattige vogelkooi rub-on...die moest een prominent plaatsje op mijn layout krijgen.
Beck is a young program who becomes the skillful leader of a revolution inside the computer world of The Grid. His mission is to free his home and friends from the reign of the villainous Clu 2 and his henchman General Tesler. Beck will be trained by Tron – the greatest warrior the Grid has ever come to know. Tron will not only teach Beck the fighting and light cycle skills he needs to challenge this brutal military occupation, but he will be a guide and mentor to him as he grows beyond his youthful, impulsive nature into a courageous, powerful, strong leader. Destined to become the next Tron of the system, Beck adopts Tron’s persona and becomes the archenemy of General Tesler and his oppressive forces
Name: Smilers
No...it has bars, just like the hotel entrance. Just no glass.
How many hours of sleep do you require each night?
The resulting sponges looked - and felt - like frisbees. And probably tasted like that too.
But, once a year, Burlington would pull the stick out of its collective ass and throw a party.
Bearing in mind my aversion to the nasty colour temperature of CFLs, I’m being circumspect about LEDs. I’ve so far bought 5 different bulbs from different suppliers, and I’m experimenting to see which one I like best. I have a favourite so far, but it’s still not perfect, so I’ll keep buying one-off bulbs until I settle on the answer. If you want to know which ones I’ve tried, I’m happy to list them all another time. I keep buying bulbs that list themselves as ‘warm white’. One even promised a colour temperature of 2800k. They all look very similar, and to my eye look quite a bit cooler than 2800k. The main difference is that one of them comes on instantly, and the others all have different delays of up to a second. So now if you switch on the lights in the mudroom you get an odd effect of each lamp coming on at a slightly different speed. Also, one was REALLY bright, so I put that in the basement.
The little girl said, "She ran out of gas about halfway down the block, so another dog is pushing her home."
Parenting a Child with Sensory Integration Disorder
Played my first game of the new D&D play-test and it felt really old school. Strange how being butchered to a man by hobgoblins will do that... There were no survivors.
RND 21: 1 hdc in each of first 9 stitches, sl st into next stitch. Leave rest of row unstitched. Finish off, leaving a long tail for sewing. Do not pull closed. Stuff body firmly.
The outfit was…….a character builder……just in itself.
Her research from 2008 found that in dual-earning households, women were contributing about 45 percent of a family’s income on average.
Other stuff as per the label; Produced to full ACO organic standards. No artificial fertilisers, chemically synthesised weedicides, pesticides, fungicides, fumigants, growth promotants etc. A sound regenerative organic farming system is used. Cows requiring treatment receive vitamins, herbs, and homeopathic treatments.
Amen. You can’t think about that too much. But we don’t think about it often, do we? day to day, during the week.
our first meeting was in January. I knew one girl before all the grad stuff started because she and I are in the same Bible study group that my cousin is in charge of, so we see each about once a month or so.
-EW
Sizzix embossing folder
'That's all vaa-ry well, sir,' retorted the malcontent; 'but trade is trade. Look here; if a cove--'
At least 20 people have been killed in Cairo in an attack on a protest near the Egyptian Ministry of Defence.
If I were that way inclined and were looking for a good piece of cheese to have sex with, Swiss would be the one since it already has the holes, half the work is already done for you. True, you may need to do a little modification and enlarge the holes slightly (yet another use for your Swiss Army knife) but all in all there would be considerably less mess to clean up afterwards. I'm wondering if there is a name for people who like to have it off with cheese. There must be one for food fetishists although I have no idea what it is, why would I? I don't mess with cheese although I was once slightly aroused whilst peeling some carrots in the nude and who doesn't get embarrassed when eating a banana in public?
You'd probably be very pissed if you went to a cinema today and plopped down 10 bucks and got a film like this on the screen. But enjoying it on your screen at home is a completely different matter.
I delete the emails I know I won't need again, immediately after reading them. Then every now and then I sort the others into folders- Family, Friends, Blog, Bills, Birth & Baby, Receipts, Organising, and so on. I have quite a few folders, and I can always add a new one if an email I need to keep doesn't belong in any folders I already have.
Are we nearly there yet?
A variety of bubbles can buy, the women, except your lady will know the rule, and also its particular a Louis Vuitton purse and sustainable made the same keep in baby bags men Some time likely to precious, unique are now living lucidity? Louis Vuitton travel luggage, incidents where make a decision invest in totes.
3. A man is turned into a snake, not only once, but twice (it's two different dudes, sorry if I didn't really word that correctly), and we get to see the results at varying times.
Me: "I want to come out and help you. Don't over do it. I don't want you to hurt yourself. Maybe I could just come out and clear the porch and the stairs..."
the music of our past chiming every hour
To know even one life has breathed easier because you have lived
However the girls were the last thing on my mind at that moment. For there were more serious concerns. I would soon be in an unknown city with not a penny in my pocket. I was wishing I had hidden some money inside my socks, in the secret pocket of my pant and inside my bag as I always used to. I of course still had my room bookings. But what would I do for food and my journey back to Cologne? I did not even have money to call up my friends. Only hope was to turn myself in at the local police station and hope they would safely deport me back to India. Only silver lining on the cloud would be that I could save on the return air fare if the Austrian police sent me back at their cost.
protecting the innocent, of course. But look how proud Granny Towanda is!
Another thing I am realising is that, if you are going to do a project like this, then you really have to do it. You have to be brave and confrontational with yourself and you can’t hold back. The interesting images that will hold the attention of the audience are the ones that really get into the personal or intimate moments.
"But those are for little kids," he laughed out at me.
If you look at the shadows on his legs you will also see that they fall in line from the candle, so they are darkest under his night shirt and lightest on the front side, though they aren't as pale as the skin on his face where the candle light is strongest. I also did not give his legs any yellow highlights.
The historical Jesus didn’t take a single “political” position (in the sense we are discussing) except arguably the brilliant and much-debated answer to Pharisees seeking to trap him on tax obligations: “Render unto Caesar the things which are Caesar’s, and unto God the things that are God’s” (Matthew 22:21). And they were amazed and went away (Matthew 22:22).
The biggest test of a man is passed when he can say he’s not ready yet. You will show strength and wisdom in saying “I’m not ready for sex. I’m not ready for all that comes with it so I’m not ready for it.” The most powerful men in the world are the men who have control of themselves and their sex drive. If it has control of you, you lose. But take control and your power and passion for life will multiply. Sex will be great when you are ready for one woman for life.
Ages: 14 and up
· Material Girl: Posh pink with Holographic Bubblegum Glitter
83 The Color Purple – Alice Walker*
Meine Karte paßt auch zu diesen Challenges:
When I left to go back home, I didn’t want to leave and I didn’t know when I was going to see her again. I didn’t know how I was going to make it happen when I had no vacation time left.
I guess it was right. Life moves on. Things get better. I get better and with help, I'm getting better each day. Although I can remember those events - that day sat in the car just numb - emotionally, I can't connect with what went on. It's a bit like.... walking out of the woods. Leaving a cold forest and as you walk into the sun, you can feel the shadows falling from your back.
So you see, I'm highly qualified to direct people on how to Swag at BEA, because I've done all of Disney World in a couple of days, survived to tell the tale - and go back and do it again several more times. And of course, there's the hard evidence. Last year I scored $1100 worth of books. This year I got more.
So this morning The Jib announces that she has to go potty. #2, to be exact. (Not her words, she's not that delicate about it - HA!)
12-25-2011
The second road said, “I am the golden road, the road of warriors. Walk along me and I will give you strength. Invincible strength! Strength that will strike down even death in one blow!”
but that still remains to be seen.
Estimated OG: 1.052 SG
Froman underwent 39 operations over the years. She fought amputation and wore a leg brace the remainder of her life. However, she returned to Europe and entertained American troops in 1945. Despite having to walk with crutches, she gave 95 shows throughout Europe. During the 40s Froman became addicted to painkillers. Although she successfully underwent detoxification, she later had problems with alcohol addiction.
so sweet!
Here is the blurb from Thursday’s Child:
Whatever the reason, X the struggling starlet did appear on the high-rating TV chat show.
Pumpkin painting and face painting this Sunday
The vet lady told my mom that I'm not supposed to be jumping on the bed, but my mom has been letting me sleep on the bed anyway. (Thanks for breaking the rules, momma!) She gets upset when I jump up and down to chase the cat. It's not my fault the cat keeps taunting me!
As for being laughed out of the country, China is building multitudes of coal-fired power stations because they are the most efficient for bulk power generation.
windblown
(A souple jade (girl) she was, and strang (strong),
-Greg has been working his networking ass off trying to find all the equipment we need. He already acquired a plow for us. It’s a John Deere plow, made somewhere between 1929 and 1931. We’re just about done refurbishing it, so new pics will be posted soon. This is what it looked like when he got it home:
UK Publisher: EMI Music Publishing
Anyway, this DIY Oakland troupe play an ugly, downtuned hybrid of sludgy "blues crust" complete with cavernous bellowing vocals, extended doom passages, and absolutely epic cover art. How can you even look at that shit without wanting to spend the measly $5 bucks to purchase it? I demand that you head over to sludgecrust camp and get your fucking shit together.
Hey and welcome to this week's Carnival! Today we're talking about HUNGER GAMES: DISTRICT INDIE -- characters from books that would be the ultimate competitors in the HUNGER GAMES and why.
Now, what I did was bake it most of the way, until it was set but not brown, and did this the day before, then refrigerated it. About an hour before we ate, after the hand and turkey were finished in the oven, I put it in with the greenbean casserole (also made the day before) and let it finish browning.
Because the weather was very yucky, we were sort of stuck in the house, but the boys did manage to seize their only opportunity on Friday where there was a small four hour window where no rain fell, so they decided to go play golf. They were literally the only ones on the course, but they said they had fun. Who ever has a whole course all to themselves?
The work of your client Lynne Griffin reflects themes and sensibilities similar to mine. I'm writing to ask if you would like to take a look at my contemporary women's novel, The Underside of Joy.
I am not training my children to parent themselves, as I think the Pearls tried to do. I am not training them to avoid dangerous situations all by themselves before they are developmentally able to do so. To act perfectly even in my absence. I am not training them not to hit each other by using punishments. At this point, they both know that hitting hurts. It's not that I need to teach them that lesson. What I want them to learn is that I am here to protect them. I am here to prevent the opportunities for them to hurt each other, and to hug and comfort them if I can't prevent it.
Some were born to fly. And some are forced to pick up the feathers. So it was with my grandfather, who served in the Army Air Force during World War II. He loved planes, loved flying, and had hoped to take the skies, to lead missions. He wanted to be a hero, like in the movies.
Castor waited while she circled it, sniffed, testing carefully.
Mickey Rourke puts in a fantastic performance as King Hyperion. However, the same cannot be said for the rest of the cast. Forget immortal, the majority of the Gods and nearly all of the human characters fail to deliver anything remotely memorable in their performances. Immortals is littered with mediocre acting that never successfully grasps the on-screen intensity necessary for the movies epic subject matter.
These sections provided for, among others, accreditation of second-hand goods dealers' associations and regulated "suspicious transactions", as well as the possession, acquisition and disposal of controlled metal cable, for example, copper.
7) I will always love him
That’s a good thing.
Youtube video of Holder admitting he hadn’t read the law he demonized and threatened to use the full weight and power of the federal government to attack:
If I am not mistaken if we asked our mum how to cook any dishes, they usually do not have any specific or actual ingredients and they will tell us to put some of these, some of that, a little bit of this and more of that and just cook about how long. And now, we are so lucky that we can always look out for the best recipes through the internet and thereafter we can cook according to our liking in the ingredients in it.
I am sitting at the "fun" work desk and drawing with prismacolor pencils....
“It’s the wrong thing to do, it’s not the right thing to do. The pollution of Beijing strong-arm politics has reached the prime minister’s office,”
I am so impressed. I seriously wish I could write (know what I want to write, that is) as quickly as I can type. I think you’re my hero! You’re here to promote STRANGE PACKAGING. Can you introduce our readers to the story?
I am using priscillastyles Lion image this week. This is the most adorable little critter and invokes all kinds of imaginative thoughts in my head. I know you have all seen the sweet, soft, cuddly and plush little stuffed animals out there for babies. Well, this image sent me on a journey to try and make a card to see if I could catch that feel. Let's take a look at where I went.
13. It’s better late than...
At this point, all the layers are cut and assembled in the following order:
"Dick had emphysema, which is a lung condition caused by smoking which results in people struggling for breath," a Quit spokesman said. "Dick is sending out a strong message to smokers as he doesn't want others to suffer."
This is a dilemma because we have a lovely house, we've started building a life together and J will still need to be based in Portarlington.
Not really. There’s nothing hot or amusing about smoking. I was just playing around with this cigar on the balcony of the hotel in Mexico. It never even touched my lips (Monica Lewinsky…see I wrote it before you thought it). The view from this balcony was breathtaking. You could see the beach and the green-blue ocean stretched out for miles.
completely, then brush off the salt.
By the time I finished thrifting I needed to return to reality and pick up the kids, oversee homework, make dinner, and start the evening routine. Nevertheless, right now I feel completely relaxed, completely at peace, and ready to start this next year of life.
Military chiefs fear pleasure pilots could accidentally stray across the widened boundaries, leaving air controllers unclear as to whether it is a genuine mistake or a hijacked plane destined for the Olympic Stadium in Stratford, east London…..
Depression is similar. People who have never thought about cutting themselves or ending their lives or just how much everything sucks right then see this as a acute condition and not a chronic one, so they try to fix me instead of the action that my disability prevents. It’s a little bit like seeing a person in a wheelchair struggling to reach something and giving them a lecture on how to not be in a wheelchair…instead of just handing it to them.
“Oh!” exclaimed Mr. Waters. He waited a while as if for Colville to say more, but the latter remained silent, and the old man gave his hand again in farewell. “I must really be going. I hope you won’t think me intrusive in my mistaken conjecture?”
Cover, and cook on High for 4 to 5 hours. Remove bay leaves before ladling into bowls.
In Kashmir, the lapsed terrorist and political protestor Shakeel Ahmad Bhat (aka the “Islamic Rage Boy,” who made it to newspapers worldwide in 2007) speaks heartrendingly about outrages visited on his family by police in his childhood, a black-and-white that he still inhabits despite, or perhaps because of, his troubles. Elsewhere, in the closing sections of a forceful critique of Naxalism, French visits Delhi’s infamous Tihar Jail to meet one of the movement’s masterminds: the recently arrested Kobad Ghandy. He asks the ideologue how he can continue to believe in Maoism after the arbitrary snuffing out of hundreds of thousands of lives in Mao’s China. Ghandy acknowledges there have been mistakes, but valiantly defends the “philosophy” of the movement. “When taken to an extreme,” remarks French acidly, “idealism is little more than a form of prejudice.”
I'm reading a book right now, where the author has done it a little differently, and it's working very well. It's a variation of the bomb in the back pocket.
Some background about our state court judges and their staff…The number of authorized judicial positions is set by statute and those appointments are made by the Governor. At any given time there are unfilled judgeships. Currently there are 25 judicial vacancies.
*Pattened Paper: Unknown
12 engines
So I’m painting my Cryx. I wanted a completely rusty, old, decaying metal on them. Not just some rust effects, but completely messed up “undead” looking metal plates and joints. And for once in like 15 years, I went from theory to practice with the same actual results! So here’s how I did this.
22 58 03.22 S , 134 26 52.57 W
Our tree, however, is a perfect story book fir, a thickly prickly deep green cone. It is decorated with a mixture of gorgeous danish filigree ornaments (thanks to my mother-in-law's excellent Christmas taste), and a hotchpotch of other items; precious preschool offerings, some wooden jungle animals, the mini mirrored disco balls I picked up in the Haight a few years back, my beloved disembodied cat heads, a variety of spangled vehicles and, the new additions, a couple of crocheted octopi from a recent craft fair.
"Well you sure aren't acting like it"
I read or hear one thing, and my mind jumps to the worst conclusion. I'm going blind from staring at a computer screen. I'm dehydrated from not drinking a full glass of water every morning. I have carpal tunnel from typing so much. The earth is becoming over populated, and soon we'll be out of natural resources and be forced to find a way to sustain life on Mars.
Lossy and Lossless Codecs
2 talks
flambay - speed correction and RDNZL patch
june..whalley waltz (get in!!)
Oliver is a recent addition to Kimberly's life as he was just adopted a couple of months ago. He was Kimberly's foster dog and she just couldn't let him go. One look and she was hooked. He is a fast growing puppy who steals the hearts of many with his adorable coon mannerisms. Ollie is playful, energetic, and loves walking the city streets of downtown Raleigh.
Cream butter and sugar until light and fluffy. Add eggs and vanilla. Mix well. Mix dry ingredients and add a little at a time to butter mixture. Mix until flour is completely incorporated and the dough comes together.
1 chuckled
Cyndi's List has compiled a great list of free forms and charts designed to help you organize your research here.
“Change must start within one individual.”
And because I haven't shown a picture of Woods on the blog in a while and he was being so cute while doing it, here is a picture of Woods who was very amused with my palm from Palm Sunday mass yesterday.
Chris: Oh good! I love to spread the happiness! And whatever else that gets sprayed around as a result too! ;-)
Winterson says as "a Northern working-class girl, she was not encouraged to be clever". Her adoptive father worked in a factory and her mother stayed at home. There were only six books in the house, including the Bible and Cruden's Complete Concordance to the Old and New Testaments. One of the other books was Malory's Le Morte d'Arthur, which she says started her life quest of reading and writing.
“Ugh! Damn me. Damn Shahzeb. Damn everyone!” she hissed angrily and then walked back into her room.
She started to fasten the buttons up the front of his shirt. So like a child, she thought. This is what it would be like if they had a child, dressing it. She looked up at his face. If they had a child, would it look like him, or like her? Perhaps a bit of both? If so, which bits, she wondered? There was still a triumphant, ecstatic look in his eyes. He’d swum. He’d proved he was a free man and buzzed with the satisfaction of someone who has simply been able to put his thoughts into immediate action. He’d broken through the barrier, even if he’d found nothing on the other side but unbreathable water and a green darkness.
But because they need to get rid of so many, they can't really deal with somebody who just needs one, or a dozen, or even a hundred of them. They need to deal with somebody who will take all of them.
Applicants are not issued licenses if they are deemed to be at risk of becoming violent. As enforced in South Africa, this could simply mean that a person was divorced, separated or fired within the past two years.
Waiting for something to happen, travelling, day-dreaming, staring into the space, watching series on TV in the evenings ...etc, these are all hidden moments, which can be filled or can be replaced with something else, which could give, result a better life in the Present.
* mile marker (read my initial review HERE): chronicles the destruction of a relationship and the sense of blame and acceptance one has to take in the aftermath. if you stole from me/i blame myself/i gave too long/didn't i?/it's no mystery.
I am extremely happy that I got a taste of some of the best Southern Indian food that one can find anywhere on the planet!
All was quiet when they reached the room. The fireplace was without wood but burning more brightly than it ever had or ever would again. Mandy and Dee sat on the sofa very close to each other, hands mostly covering their faces. Standing in the middle of the room was the old man from the cornfield. He was holding Alyssa’s limp body. His animal sat quietly at his side until it saw Hank. Then it began to growl.
10/17 Minneapolis, MN @ Roberts off 10
the surprisingly easy solo drive home to carolina.
Well, I had a lovely morning yesterday - I attended a Christmas Crafting class run by Ruth and we made 4 lovely Christmas cards using Stampin Up products (I've not used those before and I am very impressed!). Hopefully, I can photograph the cards and post them later today. I'm looking forward to attending another class with Ruth next month.
I'm so glad you're here! This says a few things to me:
It all sounded good. Sure, I said, I'm happy for you to interview me.
54 that's
By the time she got a firm hold, her awareness drawn in tightly to bear down on her writhing Gift, she was up to sixteen. Just enough time to settle her thoughts and focus. The ground swallowed them, spitting them out with the same lurch of the guts, hurling them up the tower. Pevan killed the extant Gateway, ripped the two squirming Gates-to-be apart and slammed the second into place.
At £84.00 total, you are getting over 15% discount on our normal price – which already includes our standard 10% discount – of £99.48.
On top of this my new business cards finally arrived! With them came yet another chance for those new to Moo to save.
June 7
Hope to see you there! Enjoy the hop!
Not too long ago I was invited down to London to check out Very's SS12 collection. The collections were mostly muted nudes and pastels with embellishments and prints galore. As always, I left wanting it to be Spring Summer right this instant and throw out my opaque tights, winter coats and scarves and embrace the SS12 collection with bare legs and thin layers. Given the weather at the moment, it just seems so very far away, what torture!
Interviewer: (blank stare)
As a side note: The Canon Guy has the perfect job - he gets to play with the newest, the best, and most expensive camera equipment!!! I had some serious lens envy going...
‘The goal that I set to defeat Al Qaeda and deny it a chance to rebuild is now within our reach.’
our lungs are full of laughs
Kevin Ayers: Stranger In Blue Suede Shoes
You are now ready to start your wreath. If you have a garden with evergreen trees, cut some evergreen branches from one of your trees.If you don't , see if you can get some from a nearby forest or from nature- don't take too much, though- you don't want to leave behind a very bare tree as that is not very nice for other people !!
So here’s the bottom line: Be judicious. Before posing a question Web-style, justify it. Isn’t it better to state things are better stated?
Q. Quote from a movie: "Hello. My name is Inigo Montoya. You killed my father. Prepare to die." (The Princess Bride)
I’m not sure if this happens for all of you, but I am always very grateful to meet people who understand even when few words are exchanged. No, I am not a fool for politeness and I often find, in my cynical nature, a distaste towards the strange concept of positivism that I could never quite comprehend. I can distinguish between social polite conversation, hypocrisy, and genuine concern. What I refer to here, is the meeting with people you can click with – even if you’ve met only briefly.
The car stops in a place surrounded by trees. She lets me out. I sniff the air. I’m excited by all the new interesting smells.
-currently listening to: Reinventing Yourself by Steve Chandler
But it’s actually worse than this for Bob, because my interpretation of the passage is not just possible. It’s correct. And given the context, his interpretation is not possible at all.
Look, I'd be the first to admit that my sewing skills are a bit dodgy. Both my Mum and my Nana were pretty consummate dressmakers (as my stash of formal dress would attest) but I've always been too impatient for the rigours of sewing.
I decided on four lights that will hang from the fronts of the bookcases at the top – shining down on the fronts of them. In order to do that, our electrician had to help out:
" So go back inside," he said, "harbor no fright,
Thermometer
6. New Pleasure
Washington, DC — Regardless of how weak or sophisticated their political financing regulations are, countries around the world are equally failing to effectively regulate the flow of money into politics, a new report finds. The Global Integrity Report: 2011, a major investigative study of 31 countries, was released today by Global Integrity, an award-winning international nonprofit organization that tracks governance and corruption trends globally.
Last week I bought what was dubbed an "indoor bulb garden" - no blooms, just greenery and buds. A lot like the one shown in the photo at the top of this post, it now has three mini-daffodils with more to come, one blue hyacinth and one in bud, and something very mysterious in bud that I can't wait to see. It may not be spring outdoors, but it is indoors!
Monkey Bars (makes 8-12, depending on desired size)
I like the Subaru wagons - they have space for gear, rifles, and groceries. It's a full time four wheel drive vehicle that many use for off-road fun. They're tough. That, I like. It pares well with my survivalist mentality.
You’ve brought to bed
Well, Hubby is gone today, so the piano is being delivered in his absence.
Remember when I said this was a "gimmick film", and that screenshot doesn't lie - there is indeed a bell that sounds when a frightening scene comes up. And believe it or not, it only comes up once; when Doc does a surgical incision on the cat/man beastie. That's the part. There may be a few jump scares here and there, but they aren't given the bell. I guess because then they wouldn't be jump scares. But for horror fans, to get a warning for an upcoming surgical scene that warns us not to look at the surgical scene because it would be scarier than anything else we've seen or will see later on, I guess 1959 had tighter reins on the world audience as far as what could cause death by fright. Keep in mind, this is before Herschell Gordon Lewis gave us Blood Feast, so one surgical cut in someone's (or something's) simulated skin will have to do for having a nurse on call to treat fainting victims.
Rotten Tomatoes: 16%
15 oz fat free ricotta cheese (I like Polly-o)
Can we actually pull off a move/ remodel with both of us running our own businesses, 2 kids that I already feel like I am neglecting, and having to get the current house toned down (goodbye squiggle walls) and staged to sell all in a matter of months?
After a particularly long day of toggling between relatives and friends, we ended our adventures with a makeshift picnic on the beach. Comprised of the most amazing Gyros you will ever, EVER eat ( cross my heart, hope to die), blankets and sand mats, and a cloudy but lovely sunset, it was a relaxing and perfect ending to the busy day. After consuming my weight in Greek meats, I hopped up ( ok, wobbled and teetered up) and headed to the surf to frolic and walk off the fullness of the wonderful meal. Eventually Jeff joined me, and together we walked talked, snuggled and enjoyed the sunset and cool water at our feet.
All of these doubt questions were quickly seen in my frantic hustle and bustle on the Internet; having Skype call my phone, didn’t have enough credits for that, IMing Facebook friends to call my number, no one was online or responding. More doubt came into my mind because my phone randomly turns off on it’s own. So has it turned off the only time I need to find it?
I had a quick taste of it for which I had to put down my Mexican Logger. Let me tell you, there's a difference on your palette between a 4.2 percent ABV beer and an 8.7 percent ABV beer. The Pils was hot!
Could all this be true? Or is it science fiction.
Hi! It is that time again, time for another Digi release from Clear Dollar Stamps! :)
2010.08.25 Pakistan Mohmand 2 2 A mother and her 9-year-old child are brutally murdered by Islamist gunmen.
And so we begin with the top 10 Halloween movies….
know?
We started with their oysters on the half shell, served with lime granita, pickled chiles and micro-cilantro. Hog Island serves theirs with a cup of pickled chile mignonette, which these flavors echoed nicely. I tend to prefer for my oysters to come naked and add the condiments myself, but I thought the additions on these were well balanced. James went a night or two later and thought the lime granita was too much, so you will have to be the judge for yourself. The only thing I missed was some sourdough epi bread (Hog Island serves theirs with Acme.) They're baking their own breads here, so hopefully that will come along.
The situation is not made any better by William Hague's recent announcement of a "substantial expansion" of Britain's diplomatic representation in India. Add to that the tension over the Bin Laden raid and Pakistan's already well-matured paranoia can only be intensified.
I have used a stamp from Rogue Redhead Designs from the Carnival Dream plate. I coloured a piece of stamboard using Tattered Rose, Dried Marigold, Victorian Velvet and Wild Honey. Then Spiced Marmalade was added through sequin waste. The image was stamped with Archival ink and then painted using a watercolour brush and Distress Inks. Finally I scraped the edge to give the white surround which also makes it look more like a tile. Made a tag from some Crafty individual paper which I coloured further with inks so the tile would stand out more. Added the trim and ribbons to finish.
I'll give you the usual warning about the colour. I'm not sure what the finished colour of this beer was. I do have colour analyses from the 1920's. One is 70 EBC the other 80 EBC. Definitely a dark shade of brown. Feel free to colour this beer as much as you like.
I remember watching Master Magician David Copperfield tie himself up in chains and have someone sink him in a tank of water to make his miraculous escape in front of millions of gaping mouthed television viewers. My mouth was gaping too, because I was lusting over a bag of salt and vinegar potato chips. Same thing when he had someone saw him in half while in a coffin. While everyone oohed and aahed I was in the bathroom trying to pop a zit. The guy had a cover over the escape tank and who knows how many trick compartments were in that coffin? Now having David Copperfield simply stand there naked on stage while a random audience member holding on with both hands runs a chain saw through his torso and he remains whole, that would have been a real feat of magic. Or, a really gory viral video on YouTube.
Her name was Mrs. Floro and she was of Japanese descent. She spoke with a very thick accent and attempted to teach her unruly students the finer points of algebra.
Can you see me in the lower left hand corner? Yep, the race photo with me in it made the front of the paper! I know, I'm just that awesome. Too bad the photographer cropped Kim out of the photo!
by Celso Paiva Sol
In this episode, Arya meets Jaquen H’agar (yes I’m sure I spelled that wrong but I don’t care). He doesn’t appear to be important now, but trust me when I tell you that he will be of some importance to Arya later on down the road. For anyone who didn’t catch the implications in the first episode, they practically spell out for you the fact that while he lives, Gendry is the oldest child of Robert Baratheon and therefore, it could be argued is technically his heir and rightful King. I love the scene with Tyrion and Varys. The innuendo and intrigue is obvious to anyone with a brain, and so much the more so for the fact that Tyrion’s whore Shae seems so oblivious to the undercurrents. I enjoy their repartee very much. In the north, Sam saves one of Craster’s daughter-wives from Jon’s wolf Ghost, although he didn’t look particularly threatening to me, and now he wants Jon to help him save her and her child. His innocence should make him appealing, but it just makes the character even more pathetic. You’d expect him to get killed early on in his appearance in the cast, but Martin combines his naiveté with dumb luck and so Samwell Tarly is around for a long time. In the red waste Rakharo returns to his khaleesi…well his head anyway. It is so disheartening to us regular people that even bedraggled and with an unnatural, almost white head of hair, Emilia Clarke should look so gorgeous. Grr. Lord Baelish is a character that I came to dislike more and more as I read book after book and I can’t say that’s changing any when I watch the show. He’s cunning, cruel, slimy and has, so far as I can tell, absolutely no redeeming qualities. He actually makes Jaime Lannister look like one of the good guys. Ha! I was waiting for this. Janos Slynt gets his just desserts: he’s sent to the Wall by Tyrion. I wonder if Gendry and Arya both survive to the end of the story, will they end up together, ruling perhaps from Winterfell or King’s Landing? What? It could happen! I’m not looking to turn the series into a love story, but in the end, someone has to win the Game of Thrones. I don’t feel the least bit sorry for anything that happens to Theon. I really feel like he brings it on himself for being an entitled, whiney little brat. In the grand scheme, I think the House of the Kraken is pretty inconsequential. The TV Davos (loyal servant of Stannis Baratheon) is much more courtier than the book version of him. Not sure if I like it but I do love the actor playing him. His name is…Liam Cunningham. Hmm, I wonder how that might affect his character’s fate, if at all. Lena Headey (Cersei Lannister) does well with easy emotions like haughtiness and cruelty, but I can’t help wondering how she’ll do later on when – SPOILER ALERT! – she is brought low and must emote shame, regret etc. Guess we’ll find out. Although I will say, this is perhaps her best showing since The Jungle Book. Jon Snow you idiot! Have you learned nothing from your father’s death? Don’t try to save the boy! Honour will only get you killed….and there it is, the hit on the head. Isn’t it funny how even when we know it’s coming we root for the characters we want to succeed? Lucky for Jon, Martin has more for him to do before he’s done with him. Lucky for us.
Mr Sheridan quoted from a report of the Parliamentary Committee on Culture, Media and Sport which had described a “collective amnesia” amongst the newspaper’s executives into the scale of the group’s phone hacking activities. Mr Bird had already been asked about this, referred to below. He repeated that the committee was “biased” as “MP’s do not like tabloid newspapers poking around their private lives and expense claims”.
The Jawa Report
However, as The Slog has pointed out several times, the unwillingness of those plotters (now running the Labour Party) to raise the Hackgate question at PMQs is deeply suspicious. Above the fray these days, both Two-Jags Prescott and Fifty-Faces Mandelson have been quite happy to demand more action from the Met. But questions of the PM are always asked by Tom Watson, Chris Bryant and others outside the Shadow Cabinet. What is the Labour leadership worried about? There is a connection here between Brown’s blackmail and Hackgate; but as yet, it lacks the facts to give it some sense of order.
(David writes:)Ralph Olson asked me to post to the Forum to help clarify some of the rumors that have been circulating. Following are my notes from a conversation a few minutes ago with Ralph.
Gypsy's a great watch dog, too. She lets us know when something is amiss or there is a stranger walking down the road or an animal comes near the house. But she's not a yapper. I've really grown to love her. When I went to pick her up from the vet, he came out with her and told me what a really nice dog she is. She was good for the staff and did what they wanted her to without complaining. They bathed and dipped her before her surgery so it wouldn't be so hard on her after.
